Predictors of Difficult Intubation Among Malay Patients in Indonesia.Failure to maintain an adequate airway can lead to brain damage and death. To reduce the risk of difficulty in maintaining an airway during general anesthesia, there are several known predictors of difficult intubation. People with a Malay background have different craniofacial structures in comparison with other individuals. Therefore, different predictors should be used for patients of Malay race.The aim of this study was to determine the ability to predict difficult visualization of the larynx (DVL) in Malay patients based on several predictors, such as the modified Mallampati test (MMT), thyromental distance (TMD), and hyomental distance ratio (HMDR).This cross-sectional study included 277 consecutive patients requiring general anesthesia. All subjects were evaluated using the MMT, TMD, and HMDR, and the cut-off points for the airway predictors were Mallampati III and IV, < 6.5 cm, and < 1.2, respectively. During direct laryngoscopy, the laryngeal view was graded using the Cormack-Lehane (CL) classification. CL grades III and IV were considered difficult visualization. The area under the curve (AUC), sensitivity, and specificity for each predictor were calculated both as sole and combined predictors. Logistic regression analysis was used to determine independent predictors of DVL.Difficulty in visualizing the larynx was found in 28 (10.1%) patients. The AUC, sensitivity, and specificity for the three airway predictors were as follows: MMT: 0.614, 10.7%, and 99.2%; HMDR: 0.743, 64.2%, and 74%; and TMD: 0.827, 82.1%, and 64.7%. The combination providing the best prediction in our study involved the MMT, HMDR, and TMD with an AUC, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.835, 60.7%, and 88.8%, respectively. Logistic regression analysis showed that the MMT, HMDR, and TMD were independent predictors of DVL.The TMD, with a cut-off point of 65 mm, had superior diagnostic value compared with the HMDR and Mallampati score. Therefore, the TMD could be used in Malay patients to predict the difficulty of larynx visualization during laryngoscopy.Predictive value of upper lip bite test and ratio of height to thyromental distance compared to other multivariate airway assessment tests for difficult laryngoscopy in apparently normal patients.Various anatomical measurements and non-invasive clinical tests, singly or in various combinations can be performed to predict difficult intubation. Recently introduced "Upper lip bite test" (ULBT) and "Ratio of height to Thyromental distance" (RHTMD) are claimed to have high predictability. We conducted a study to compare the Predictive Value of ULBT and RHTMD with Mouth opening (Inter-Incisor gap) (IIG), Modified Mallampatti Test (MMT), Head and neck movement (HNM) and Thyromental Distance (TMD) for Difficult Laryngoscopy.In this prospective, single blinded observational study, 480 adult patients of either sex, ASA grade I and II were assessed and graded for ULBT, RHTMD, TMD, MMT, IIG, and HNM according to standard methods and correlated with the Cormack and Lehane grade.ULBT and RHTMD had highest sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, likelihood ratio, i.e., 74.63%, 91.53%, 58.82%, 95.7%, 31.765 and 71.64%, 92.01%, 59.26%, 95.24%, 8.96 respectively, compared to TMD, MMT, IIG and HNM.ULBT is the best predictive test for difficult laryngoscopy in apparently normal patients but RHTMD can also be used as an acceptable alternative.Modified Mallampati test, thyromental distance and inter-incisor gap are the best predictors of difficult laryngoscopy in West Africans.To determine the ability to predict difficult visualization of the larynx (DVL) from the following preoperative airway predictive indices, in isolation and combination: modified Mallampati test (MMT), thyromental distance (TMD), sternomental distance (SMD), horizontal length of the mandible (HLM) and inter-incisor gap (IIG).Three hundred and eighty consecutive patients undergoing general anesthesia were evaluated using the MMT, TMD, SMD, HLM and IIG and the cut-off points for the airway predictors were Mallampati III and IV; < or = 6.5 cm, < or = 13.5 cm, < or = 9.0 cm and < or = 4.0 cm respectively. During direct laryngoscopy, the laryngeal view was graded using the Cormack and Lehane (CL) classification. CL grades III and IV were considered difficult visualization. Sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value for each airway predictor in isolation and in combination were determined. Logistic regression analysis was used to determine independent predictors of DVL.Difficulty to visualize the larynx was found in 13 (3.4%) patients. The sensitivity, specificity and the positive predictive value for the five airway predictors were: MMT (61.5%; 98.4%; 57.1%), TMD (15.4%; 98.1%; 22.2%), SMD (0%; 100%; 0%), HLM (30.8%, 76.0%; 4.3%) and IIG (30.8%; 97.3%; 28.6%). The best combination of predictors was MMT/TMD/IIG with a sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of 84.6%; 94.6%; 35.5% respectively. Logistic regression analysis showed that weight, MMT, IIG and TMD were independent predictors of DVL.MMT, TMD and IIG appear to provide the optimal combination in prediction of DVL in a West African population.Short thyromental distance is a surrogate for inadequate head extension, rather than small submandibular space, when indicating possible difficult direct laryngoscopy.Airway research in anaesthesia shows that the thyromental distance (TMD) as a predictor of difficult intubation is subject to variable sensitivity and specificity. Recently, its value in this regard has been questioned with calls for a redefinition of its role.To define the role of TMD as a predictor of possible difficult laryngoscopy.A prospective observational study.A tertiary university teaching hospital.Two hundred and thirty-five consecutive patients (137 men), planned for endotracheal intubation anaesthesia, were enrolled in the study. Those who were edentulous, or had facial asymmetry, teeth protrusion, limited mouth opening, history of head and/or neck radiation therapy or any disorder, were excluded. Nobody was excluded once enrolled.Preoperative straight-line morphometric measurements of the mandible and submandibular space (SMS) were taken by a measuring device and used to form a three-dimensional model of SMS. Sagittal dimensions of the SMS that determine the TMD were derived using trigonometric laws.Direct laryngoscopic view, assessed by a senior anaesthetist and classified according to Cormack/Lehane classification.Thirty-two patients were reported to have 'limited laryngoscopic view'. The TMD had a sensitivity of 19% and a specificity of 97% as a predictor of laryngoscopic view. Among the factors that determine the magnitude of TMD, only the degree of head extension was significantly different between the two laryngoscopy groups. The other two factors (sagittal angulomental distance, representing mandibular growth, and sagittal angulothyroid distance, representing laryngeal descent in the neck) did not differ between the two groups. Also, the SMS volume did not differ between the two laryngoscopy groups.The role of the TMD in prediction of difficult laryngoscopy should be redefined from a variable representing the SMS volume to one acting as a surrogate for inadequate head extension.Mallampati class, obesity, and a novel airway trajectory measurement to predict difficult laryngoscopy.To determine whether Mallampati class correlates with Cormack-Lehane grade in obese adults, and investigate a novel airway trajectory measurement (ATM) to anticipate difficult laryngoscopy.Retrospective cohort plus a pilot study.One hundred eighty-four nonobese and 160 obese adults underwent laryngoscopy. Spearman correlations, gamma coefficients (G), and Kendall's τ investigated body mass index (BMI):Mallampati, BMI: Cormack-Lehane, and Mallampati:Cormack-Lehane. A z test compared the two groups. Twenty-six volunteers had neck x-rays taken in the sniffing position to examine trajectories to the larynges (ATM).Positive predictive value of high Mallampati for difficult laryngoscopy was 8.57%. BMI did not correlate with Mallampati (r = 0.055 [nonobese], r = -0.056 [obese]) or Cormack-Lehane [r = -0.014 [nonobese], r = -0.022 [obese]). Among nonobese adults, gamma coefficients for BMI:Mallampati was 0.039 (P = .63), for BMI:Cormack-Lehane was 0.02 (P = .85), and for Mallampati:Cormack-Lehane was 0.43 (P = .004). Among obese adults, gamma coefficients for BMI:Mallampati was -0.127 (P = .16), for BMI:Cormack-Lehane was 0.014 (P = .88), and for Mallampati:Cormack-Lehane was 0.365 (P = .01). Kendall's τ were comparable to gamma coefficients in all analyses. When comparing gamma coefficients for Mallampati:Cormack-Lehane among the nonobese and obese, z = 0.04 (P = .98). In the ATM study, only Mallampati and upper lip bite test had a significant relationship (G = 1.00, P < .001).Mallampati correlates poorly with Cormack-Lehane, regardless of BMI. Pilot data suggest that ATM is feasible.Sensitivity of palm print sign in prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in diabetes: A comparison with other airway indices.Diabetic patients are prone for the limited joint mobility syndrome. The atlanto-occipital joint involvement limits adequate extension of head and neck during laryngoscopy making intubation difficult. The collagen glycosylation starts in the fourth and fifth inter-phalangeal joints. The degree of inter-phalangeal involvement can be assessed by scoring the ink impression made by the palm of the dominant hand (palm print [PP] sign) The aim of our study was to evaluate the PP sign as a screening tool for predicting difficult laryngoscopy in diabetic patients.A total of 60 diabetic patients undergoing general anaesthesia with endotracheal intubation were assessed pre-operatively for their airway indices using the modified Mallampati test, thyromental distance, degree of head extension, the PP test and the prayer sign and their corresponding Cormack-Lehane scores were noted. Statistical analysis was performed using Fischer exact test.Of the 60 patients, 15 had positive PP sign. Of the 13 difficult laryngoscopies encountered, 10 patients had a positive PP sign. PP sign was the most sensitive index in predicting difficult laryngoscopy. P =0.000 was obtained and considered as statistically significant. The sensitivity was 76.9%, specificity 89.4%, positive and negative predictive value 71.4% and 91.3% and accuracy 86.7%, respectively. The other signs were not significant in predicting difficult laryngoscopy.The PP test appears to be the most sensitive and specific in the prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in diabetic patients.A retrospective analysis of airway management in obese patients at a teaching institution.To identify patient characteristics that influence the choice of awake fiberoptic intubation (AFI) versus intubation after general anesthesia in obese patients.Retrospective study.Memorial Hermann Hospital, Houston, TX.Perioperative records of 283 obese patients [body mass index (BMI) >34 kg/m2] who underwent elective surgery between January 1991 and December 1999 were studied. Patients' data were divided into two groups according to method of induction and intubation: asleep direct laryngoscopy versus AFI. Patient demographics, BMI, Mallampati airway classification, history of gastroesophageal reflux disease, peptic ulcer disease, hiatal hernia, and obstructive sleep apnea syndrome were compared between the two groups. Bivariate and multivariate analyses were performed.AFI was performed in 12 (4.2%) obese patients, and direct laryngoscopy was performed in 271 (95.8%) obese patients. Difficult intubation was reported in 21 (7.4%) cases, and there were no reported cases of failed intubations. Bivariate analyses demonstrated that AFI patients were more likely to have a BMI > or = 60 kg/m2 (P < 0.001), Mallampati class III or IV airway (P < 0.001), and be men (P = 0.004). These three factors were also statistically significant in the multivariate logistic regression. In particular, each one kg/m(2) increase in BMI was associated with a 7% increased likelihood of AFI. Men were approximately 4 times likelier than women to have an AFI. Compared with patients with a Mallampati Class I or II airway, those with Mallampati Classes III or IV were about 26 times as likelier to have an AFI.Patients selected for AFI were predominantly men, with a Mallampati Class III or IV airway, and BMI > or = 60 kg/m2.Predictive factors for difficult mask ventilation in the obese surgical population.Background Difficult Mask Ventilation (DMV), is a situation in which it is impossible for an unassisted anesthesiologist to maintain oxygen saturation >90% using 100% oxygen and positive pressure ventilation to prevent or reverse signs of inadequate ventilation during mask ventilation. The incidence varies from 0.08 - 15%. Patient-related anatomical features are by far the most significant cause. We analyzed data from an obese surgical population (BMI> 30 kg/m (2)) to identify specific risk and predictive factors for DMV. Methods Five hundred and fifty seven obese patients were identified from a database of 1399 cases associated with preoperative airway examinations where mask ventilation was attempted. Assessment of mask ventilation in this group was stratified by a severity score (0-3), and a step-wise selection method was used to identify independent predictors. The area under the curve of the receiver-operating-characteristic was then used to evaluate the model's predictive value. Adjusted odds ratios and their 95% confidence intervals were also calculated. Results DMV was observed in 80/557 (14%) patients. Three independent predictive factors for DMV in obese patients were identified: age 49 years, short neck, and neck circumference 43 cm. In the current study th sensitivity for one factor is 0.90 with a specificity 0.35. However, the specificity increased to 0.80 with inclusion of more than one factor. Conclusion According to the current investigation, the three predictive factors are strongly associated with DMV in obese patients. Each independent risk factor alone provides a good screening for DMV and two factors substantially improve specificity. Based on our analysis, we speculate that the absence of at least 2 of the factors we identified might have a significant negative predictive value and can reasonably exclude DMV, with a negative likelihood ratio 0.81. Comment on the article by Bindra A et al.: is the modified Mallampati test performed in supine position a reliable predictor of difficult tracheal intubation?Application of the upper lip catch test for airway evaluation in edentulous patients: An observational study.Application of upper lip catch test (ULCT) for airway evaluation in edentulous patients.This research is an evaluation of a clinical diagnostic test in edentulous patients prior to operation. Five hundred eighty eight edentulous patients in a referral university hospital, between March 2008 and June 2011 scheduled for elective surgery under general anesthesia were enrolled. Those unable to open the mouth and those with pharyngo-laryngeal pathology were excluded. ULCT was assessed and compared with Cormack-Lehane grading as a gold standard for airway evaluation.A high negative predictive value of 99.4% was a notable finding for the ULCT. The results also showed a high specificity (89.4%), high sensitivity (75.0%) and a high accuracy (89.3%) in a comparatively higher range for the ULCT.The ULCT proved to be a useful predictor for airway assessment in edentulous patients in this setting. Further studies are needed to reconfirm its validity in other ethnic groups.Prediction of difficult tracheal intubation in thyroid surgery.The incidence of difficult endotracheal intubation (DEI) for patients undergoing thyroidectomy has rarely been studied, and evaluation of factors linked to DEI is limited to a few studies. We undertook this prospective study to investigate the incidence of DEI in the presence of goiter (an enlargement of the thyroid gland) and to evaluate factors linked to DEI. We studied 320 consecutive patients scheduled for thyroidectomy. DEI was evaluated by an intubation difficulty scale. The trachea was intubated by an unassisted anesthesiologist, and the intubation difficulty scale was calculated. A univariate analysis was performed to identify potential factors predicting DEI, followed by a multivariate analysis. DEI was reported in 17 patients. The rate of easy tracheal intubation was 36.9%; the rate for patients who had minor difficulty of intubation was 57.8%. Sex (male), body mass index, Mallampati class, thyromental distance, neck mobility, Cormack grade, cancerous goiter, and tracheal deviation or compression were identified in the univariate analysis as potential DEI risk factors. With multivariate analysis, two criteria were recognized as independent for DEI (Cormack Grade III or IV and cancerous goiter). We conclude that the large goiter is not associated with a more frequent DEI. However, the presence of a cancerous goiter is a major factor for predicting DEI.Predicting difficult intubation.The amount of larynx seen at intubation was assessed in 633 adult patients undergoing routine surgery. Various measurements of the head and neck were made in an attempt to discover which features were associated with difficulty with laryngoscopy (defined as the inability to see even the arytenoids). In addition 38 patients, reported by colleagues because they had been "difficult to intubate", were measured. Five useful risk factors, measured at three levels of severity, were identified. A simple predictive rule was developed and tested on a prospective set of 778 patients, in 1.5% of whom laryngoscopy was found to be difficult. Depending on the threshold chosen, the rule allowed the detection of, for example, 75% of the "difficult" laryngoscopies at a cost of falsely identifying 12% of the "not difficult" patients.High body mass index is a weak predictor for difficult and failed tracheal intubation: a cohort study of 91,332 consecutive patients scheduled for direct laryngoscopy registered in the Danish Anesthesia Database.Previous studies have failed to detect high body mass index (BMI) as a risk factor for difficult tracheal intubation (DTI). BMI was investigated as a risk factor for DTI in patients planned for direct laryngoscopy.A cohort of 91,332 consecutive patients planned for intubation by direct laryngoscopy was retrieved from the Danish Anesthesia Database. A four-point scale to grade the tracheal intubation was used. Age, sex, American Society of Anesthesiologists physical status classification, priority of surgery, history of previous DTI, modified Mallampati-score, use of neuromuscular blocker, and BMI were retrieved. Logistic regression to assess whether BMI was associated with DTI was performed.The frequency of DTI was 5.2% (95% confidence interval [CI] 5.0-5.3). In multivariate analyses adjusted for other significant covariates, BMI of 35 or more was a risk for DTI with an odds ratio of 1.34 (95% CI 1.19-1.51, P < 0.0001). As a stand alone test, BMI of 35 or more predicted DTI with a sensitivity of 7.5% (95% CI 7.3-7.7%) and with a predictive value of a positive test of 6.4% (95% CI 6.3-6.6%). BMI as a continuous covariate was a risk for failed intubation with an odds ratio of 1.031 (95% CI 1.002-1.061, P < 0.04).High BMI is a weak but statistically significant predictor of difficult and failed intubation and may be more appropriate than weight in multivariate models of prediction of DTI.Diagnostic predictor of difficult laryngoscopy: the hyomental distance ratio.We evaluated the usefulness of the hyomental distance (HMD) ratio (HMDR), defined as the ratio of the HMD at the extreme of head extension to that in the neutral position, in predicting difficult visualization of the larynx (DVL) in apparently normal patients, by examining the following preoperative airway predictors, alone and in combination: the modified Mallampati test, HMD in the neutral position, HMD and thyromental distance at the extreme of head extension and HMDR.Preoperatively, we assessed the five airway predictors in 213 adult patients undergoing general anesthesia with tracheal intubation. A single experienced anesthesiologist, blinded to the results of the airway evaluation, performed all of the direct laryngoscopies and graded the views using the modified Cormack and Lehane scale. DVL was defined as a Grade 3 or 4 view. The optimal cutoff points for each test were determined at the maximal point of the area under the curve in the receiver operating characteristic curve. For the modified Mallampati test, Class >or=3 was predefined as a predictor of DVL.The larynx was difficult to visualize in 26 (12.2%) patients. In univariate analyses, the HMD and thyromental distance at the extreme of head extension and the HMDR were significantly related to DVL. The HMDR with the optimal cutoff point of 1.2 had greater diagnostic accuracy (area under the curve of 0.782), than other single predictors (P < 0.05), and it alone showed a greater diagnostic validity profile (sensitivity, 88%; specificity, 60%) than any test combinations.The HMDR with a test threshold of 1.2 is a clinically reliable predictor of DVL.Avoidance of neuromuscular blocking agents may increase the risk of difficult tracheal intubation: a cohort study of 103,812 consecutive adult patients recorded in the Danish Anaesthesia Database.Previous studies indicate that avoiding neuromuscular blocking agents (NMBAs) may be a risk factor for difficult tracheal intubation (DTI). We investigated whether avoiding NMBA was associated with DTI.A cohort of 103,812 consecutive patients planned for tracheal intubation by direct laryngoscopy was retrieved from the Danish Anaesthesia Database. We used an intubation score based upon the number of attempts, change from direct laryngoscopy to a more advanced technique, or intubation by a different operator. We retrieved data on age, sex, ASA physical status classification, priority of surgery, time of surgery, previous DTI, modified Mallampati score, BMI, and the use of NMBA. Using logistic regression, we assessed whether avoiding NMBA was associated with DTI.The frequency of DTI was 5.1 [95% confidence interval (CI): 5.0-5.3]%. In a univariate analysis, avoiding NMBA was associated with DTI, odds ratio (OR) 1.52 (95% CI: 1.43-1.61)%, P<0.0001. Using multivariate analysis, avoiding NMBA was associated with DTI, OR 1.48 (95% CI: 1.39-1.58), P<0.0001. Among patients intubated using NMBA, a multivariate analysis identified patients anaesthetized with only non-depolarizing NMBA to be more at risk for DTI than those anaesthetized with depolarizing NMBA alone.Avoiding NMBA may increase the risk of DTI. However, confounding by indication may be a problem in this observational study and systematic reviews with meta-analysis or more randomized clinical trials are needed.The causes of difficult tracheal intubation and preoperative assessments in different age groups.We studied the differences in airway assessment factors among old, middle, and young age groups, and evaluated the frequency and causes of difficult intubation among these groups.Patients were divided into young (< 40 yr, n = 75 ), middle (40-59 yr, n = 83), and old (≥ 60 yr, n = 89) group. Airway assessment factors such as head and neck movement, thyromental distance, interincisor gap, dentition, Mallampati score, and Arné score were assessed. After muscle relaxation, cervical joint rigidity and Cormack-Lehane (C-L) grade were assessed. The differences in airway assessment factors between difficult (C-L grade 3, 4) and easy (C-L grade 1, 2) intubation were then examined. Logistic regression analysis was also carried out to identify the extent to which airway assessment factors reflected difficult intubation.As aging, head and neck movement, thyromental distance, and interincisor gap decreased, the grade of dentition, Mallampati score, cervical joint rigidity and the ratio of Arné score > 11 increased. In the old and middle group, the incidence of difficult intubation was increased compared with the young group. Dentition in the young group, Mallampati score and interinsisor gap in the middle group and Mallampati score, cervical joint rigidity in the old group respectively predicted difficult intubation.Compared to young individuals, middle-aged or elderly adults are likely to experience more difficulty in endotracheal intubation and its predictive factors could vary by age group.Upper lip bite test as a predictor of difficult mask ventilation: a prospective study.Oxygenation and ventilation by means of bag-mask and ambubag play a significant role in maintaining an optimal oxygen saturation of blood and hence the essence of life itself. Predicting difficulty in mask ventilation is again of paramount importance at the time of induction of anesthesia, and in emergency situations. In this study we aimed at evaluating factors that could help in predicting the difficulty of bag-mask ventilation.In a prospective study, 200 patients were allocated into two groups, 100 each. First group with a ULBT class I, and the other group with ULBT class II and III. Factors such as height, weight, gender, past history of snoring, neck circumference, Mallampati class, sternomental and thyromental distances were then evaluated in each of the patients in the two groups in order to arrive at their impact on the incidence of difficult mask ventilation. Data were analyzed using Chi-square, student t-test and Fisher's exact tests depending upon the situation. A p < 0.05 was considered to be statistically significant.The results revealed that negative predictive value (NPV) of ULBT class, history of snoring and neck circumference were 86%, 83%, 81%, respectively. A combination of these three predictors had an NPV of 95%.ULBT class alone was of value in predicting difficulty in mask ventilation, but a combination of the three tests significantly improved the predictive value.Accurate classification of difficult intubation by computerized facial analysis.Bedside airway evaluation is conduced before anesthesia, but all current methods perform modestly, with low sensitivity and positive predictive value. We hypothesized that subjective features of patients' anatomies improve anesthesiologists' ability to predict difficult intubation, and derived a computer model to do so, based on analysis of photographs of patients' faces.Eighty male patients were divided into 2 equal cohorts for model derivation and validation. Each cohort consisted of 20 easy and 20 challenging intubations, defined as >1 attempt by an operator with at least 12 months of anesthesia experience, grade 3 or 4 laryngoscopic view, need for a second operator, or nonelective use of an alternative airway device. Photographs of each subject's face were analyzed by software that resolves each face into 61 facial proportions derived from an algorithm that models the face as a single point in a 50-dimensional eigenspace. Each parameter was tested for discriminatory ability by logistic regression, and combinations of 11 variables with P ≤ 0.1, plus Mallampati class and thyromental distance, were tested exhaustively by all possible binomial quadratic logistic regression models. Candidate models were cross-validated by maximizing the product of the area under the receiver operating characteristic curves obtained in the derivation and validation cohorts.The best model included 3 facial parameters and thyromental distance. It correctly classified 70 of 80 subjects (P < 10(-8)). In contrast, the best combination of Mallampati class and thyromental distance correctly classified 47 of 80 (P = 0.073). Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the curve for the computer model were 90%, 85%, and 0.899, respectively.Computerized analysis of facial structure and thyromental distance can classify easy versus difficult intubation with accuracy significantly outperforming popular clinical predictive tests.Difficult intubation in obese patients: incidence, risk factors, and complications in the operating theatre and in intensive care units.Intubation procedure in obese patients is a challenging issue both in the intensive care unit (ICU) and in the operating theatre (OT). The objectives of the study were (i) to compare the incidence of difficult intubation and (ii) its related complications in obese patients admitted to ICU and OT.We conducted a multicentre prospective observational cohort study in ICU and OT in obese (BMI≥30 kg m(-2)) patients. The primary endpoint was the incidence of difficult intubation. Secondary endpoints were the risk factors for difficult intubation, the use of difficult airway management techniques, and severe life-threatening complications related to intubation (death, cardiac arrest, severe hypoxaemia, severe cardiovascular collapse).In cohorts of 1400 and 11 035 consecutive patients intubated in ICU and in the OT, 282 (20%) and 2103 (19%) were obese. In obese patients, the incidence of difficult intubation was twice more frequent in ICU than in the OT (16.3% vs 8.2%, P<0.01). In both cohorts, risk factors for difficult intubation were Mallampati score III/IV, obstructive sleep apnoea syndrome, and reduced mobility of cervical spine, while limited mouth opening, severe hypoxaemia, and coma appeared only in ICU. Specific difficult airway management techniques were used in 66 (36%) cases of difficult intubation in obese patients in the OT and in 10 (22%) cases in ICU (P=0.04). Severe life-threatening complications were significantly more frequent in ICU than in the OT (41.1% vs 1.9%, relative risk 21.6, 95% confidence interval 15.4-30.3, P<0.01).In obese patients, the incidence of difficult intubation was twice more frequent in ICU than in the OT and severe life-threatening complications related to intubation occurred 20-fold more often in ICU.Current controlled trials. Identifier: NCT01532063.[Difficult intubation in otorhinolaryngologic laser surgery. Is there a predictive parameter?].In the planning of laser surgery for ENT operations, the specialist is often consulted by the anesthesiologist to predict possible intubation problems. Intubation problems in such operations can occur frequently due to the pathological findings present in the upper aerodigestive tract and the different constructions of laser-resistant endotracheal tubes. The aim of this study was to determine if a known predictive parameter could have a sufficient sensitivity and specificity to reliably predict possible intubation problems for ENT-related laser surgery. In a prospective study, 91 patients were included and the Mallampati-score modified by Samsoon and Young was analyzed and compared to a score describing the actual conditions of intubation. The results showed a significant correlation (p < 0.05, Chi-Square test). However, the specificity was only 72% and the sensitivity of 60% was too low to be of practical use. The results were independent of the endotracheal tube used. Although use of the laser for ENT operations provides a special situation for the anesthesiologist, there is still no system that is sensitive and specific enough to be of practical use. This problem is demonstrated in a literature review.Diagnostic value of the upper lip bite test in predicting difficulty in intubation with head and neck landmarks obtained from lateral neck X-ray.Unanticipated difficult tracheal intubation remains a primary concern of anaesthesiologists and upper lip bite test (ULBT) is one of the assessments used in predicting difficult intubation. In this study, we aimed to check the utility of lateral neck X-ray measurements in improving the diagnostic value of the ULBT.In a prospective study conducted from January 2007 until December 2010, we recorded personal and demographic data of 4500 patients who entered the study and subjected them to standard lateral neck radiography. Before the induction of anaesthesia, clinical examination and ULBT results were recorded and during induction of anaesthesia laryngoscopic grading was evaluated and recorded in questionnaires. All the compiled data were analysed by SPSS 14.0 (SPSS Inc., Chicago, IL, USA) software. Diagnostic value for each test was calculated and compared.Negative predictive values (NPVs) were high in all tests. ULBT had the highest specificity and NPV compared with the other tests. The positive predictive value for all the tests had been low, but marginally high in the ULBT.Although all the tests used had relatively acceptable predictive values, combination of tests appeared to be more predictive. Highest sensitivities were observed with ULBT, mandibulohyoid distance and thyromental distance respectively. Use of radiological parameters may not be suitable as screening tools, but may help in anticipating and preparing for a difficult scenario.[Direct laryngoscopy or C-MAC video laryngoscopy? Routine tracheal intubation in patients undergoing ENT surgery].Previous studies have shown that video laryngoscopy enhances laryngeal view in patients with apparently normal and difficult airways. The utility of the novel, portable, battery-powered C-MAC video laryngoscope is as yet unproven. It was hypothesized that in routine patients undergoing ENT surgery, the rate of glottic views considered unsatisfactory, i.e. Cormack and Lehane grades IIb, III, and IV, could be significantly reduced with the C-MAC video laryngoscope compared to direct laryngoscopy.Following ethical approval and sample size estimates 108 consecutive patients undergoing ENT surgery under general anesthesia were studied. First, direct laryngoscopy was performed with the naked eye. The best view obtained was graded by the first anesthesiologist without looking at the video monitor. A second anesthesiologist blinded to the laryngeal view obtained under direct laryngoscopy graded the laryngeal view on the video monitor. Endotracheal intubation using Ring-Adair-Elwyn (RAE) tracheal tubes was then attempted under video-aided visualization. The tubes were not reinforced with a stylet. The C-MAC video laryngoscopy system (Karl Storz, Tuttlingen, Germany) is a novel device that can be used with Macintosh laryngoscope blades in different sizes. A camera and light source are located recessed from the tip of the blade. The camera unit sits in a handle attached to the laryngoscope blade and is connected by a wire to a TFT video monitor. It allows for both direct and indirect laryngoscopy and the low profile of the original British Macintosh blades may prove advantageous in patients with limited mouth opening.A total of 108 patients were enrolled in the study but for various reasons only 94 completed the study (post hoc power 97%). In 89 patients a size 3 Macintosh laryngoscope was used while a size 4 blade was used in the remaining 5 patients. With direct laryngoscopy the glottic view was considered unsatisfactory in 40 patients (42%), but this was the case in only 15 patients (16%) when video laryngoscopy was used (p<0.0001). Endotracheal tube placement was successful in all but one patient where the Bonfils intubation fiberscope needed to be employed. No complications related to the C-MAC system were observed.Compared to direct laryngoscopy with a Macintosh laryngoscope blade in unselected patients undergoing ENT surgery and thus patients more susceptible to an unexpected difficult airway than a general patient population, the mobile C-MAC video laryngoscope significantly enhanced laryngeal view. Using RAE tracheal tubes seems to compensate the unfavorable deviation of optical and anatomical axes when indirect laryngoscopy is performed with the C-MAC system.Factors associated with difficult intubation in prehospital emergency medicine.When managing airways in a prehospital setting, emergency physicians have to deal with difficult intubation (DI), which increases morbidity and mortality. The primary goal of this study was to determine predictors of DI in the out-of-hospital field faced by the French physician-staffed Emergency Medical Service.The study was a prospective, observational study, including all consecutive patients intubated during a 30-month period. Patients having experienced standard intubation (two attempts or less) or DI (more than two attempts) were compared.Six hundred and ninety-four patients were included: 70 (11%) were classified as DI and 583 as standard intubations. Logistic regression showed that airways obstruction [odds ratio (OR), 4.1; 95% confidence interval (CI), 1.71-14.4], intubation on the floor (OR, 2.6; 95% CI, 1.04-6.6), and a hyoid-mental distance less than three fingers (OR, 2.3; 95% CI, 1.2-4.7) were independent predictors of DI. Immediate complications occurred in 89 patients (16%): 66 (11%) in the standard intubation group and 23 (31%) in the DI group (P<0.01).For prehospital orotracheal intubation, independent risk factors of DI are a mental-thyroid distance less than three fingers, a patient on the floor, and a superior airways obstruction. Anticipation of DI could result in fewer attempts, and fewer complications, as the rate of complication increases with the difficulty of intubation.Laryngoscopies in the obese: predicting problems and optimizing visualization.This pilot study was designed to 1) identify predictors of difficult laryngeal exposure in obese patients, 2) develop strategies for efficient intubation and intraoperative visualization of the glottis, and 3) devise perioperative protocols for difficult laryngoscopies.We undertook a retrospective study over a 1-year period of 14 consecutive patients with a body mass index of more than 30 kg/M2 who underwent elective direct laryngoscopy under general anesthesia. Measurements of height, weight, neck circumference, Mallampati score, and Cormack-Lehane classification of the airway were recorded. Problems encountered during anesthesia induction and emergence were also noted. The laryngologist recorded on a visual analog scale the degree of difficulty encountered in obtaining a binocular stereoscopic view and magnification, illumination, and suspension.Anatomic challenges during difficult laryngoscopy included decreased neck extension, redundant folds of tissue in the oropharynx and hypopharynx, and upper airway collapsibility. Overall, there was an association between the incidence of difficult laryngeal exposure and the Cormack-Lehane score (r = .57; p = .03), but the Mallampati score was of limited utility to the laryngologist. Neck size in female patients correlated with the Cormack-Lehane score (p = .02). Neither weight nor body mass index were predictive of a difficult laryngeal exposure. Straight blade laryngoscopes with a distal flange allowed greater depth of insertion and provided the best visualization of the glottis.An appropriate clinical examination may help predict a difficult airway. However, further studies are warranted to fully characterize the anatomic predictors of a difficult laryngeal exposure.Difficult laryngoscopy: incidence and predictors in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass surgery versus general surgery patients.Cardiac surgery patients might have a higher incidence of difficult laryngoscopy than the general population because of older age, dental problems, and obesity. The authors estimated the incidence and predictors of difficult laryngoscopy in coronary artery bypass surgery patients.Prospective, controlled study.University setting.Patients undergoing coronary artery bypass or general surgery.Two hundred consecutive patients undergoing coronary artery bypass graft and 444 general surgery patients, all aged >40 years, were compared for the incidence and predictors of difficult laryngoscopy, defined as a grade III or IV view.Predictors of difficult laryngoscopy were considered mouth opening <4 cm, limited cervical mobility, thyromental distance <6 cm, protruding or partially missing upper teeth, and Mallampati classes 3 and 4. More cases of difficult laryngoscopy were recorded in cardiac patients (10% v 5.2%, p <0.023). The cardiac patients were older, mostly men, and belonged to ASA III-IV risk classes. Mallampati classes 3 and 4 were more frequent in the control group. With univariate analysis, difficult laryngoscopy correlated with 7 variables: older age, ASA-IV risk class, protruding or partially missing upper teeth, limited mouth opening, limited neck movement, thyromental distance <6 cm, and diabetes mellitus. Multivariate analysis adjusted for propensity score identified older age (odds ratio = 1.05/yr, 95% confidence interval = 1.005-1.09, p < 0.03) and limited neck movement (odds ratio = 9.5, 95% confidence interval = 2.2-41, p < 0.003), but not cardiac surgery per se, as independent predictors of difficult laryngoscopy.Difficult laryngoscopy was more frequent in cardiac surgery patients (10% v 5.2%). Older age and limited neck movement, but not cardiac surgery per se, were independent predictors of difficult laryngoscopy.Relative risk analysis of factors associated with difficult intubation in obstetric anesthesia.Difficult tracheal intubation, often unexpected, has been identified as the commonest contributory factor to anesthetic-related maternal death. The ability to predict such cases preoperatively would be of great value. Preoperative airway assessment and potential risk factors for difficult tracheal intubation were recorded in 1,500 patients undergoing emergency and elective cesarean section under general anesthesia. Airway assessment using a modified Mallampati test recorded oropharyngeal structures visible upon maximal mouth opening. Potential risk factors documented were obesity; short neck; missing, protruding, or single maxillary incisors; receding mandible; facial edema; and swollen tongue. Subsequent to induction of anesthesia, the view at laryngoscopy and difficulty at intubation were graded. There was a significant (P less than 0.001) correlation between the oropharyngeal structures seen and both the veiw at laryngoscopy and difficulty at intubation. Univariate analysis demonstrated a significant association between difficult intubation and short neck (P less than 0.001), obesity (P less than 0.0001), missing maxillary incisors (P less than 0.02), protruding maxillary incisors (P less than 0.001), single maxillary incisor (P less than 0.0001), and receding mandible (P less than 0.003). Neither facial edema (P = 0.414) nor swollen tongue (P = 0.141) were found to be associated with difficult intubation. Multivariate analysis removed obesity and missing and single maxillary incisors as risk factors. Obesity was eliminated because of its strong association with short neck. The probability of experiencing a difficult intubation for various combinations of risk factors was determined.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)The best method to predict easy intubation: a quasi-experimental pilot study.To facilitate evaluation of the airway before endotracheal intubation, different scores have been developed, mainly to predict difficult airways. However, in anesthesia clinical practice in Sweden, scores would be more useful if they could also predict an easy airway, so that the correct category of anesthesia personnel can be allocated. Therefore, we evaluated whether scoring systems commonly used to predict difficult airways could also predict easy endotracheal intubation.This prospective observational study included patients who were scheduled for general anesthesia and required endotracheal intubation.Airways were evaluated preoperatively by two independent variables, namely Mallampati classification and thyromental distance. After anesthesia induction, the Cormack and Lehane grade was assessed.Mallampati scores yielded the highest specificity in predicting easy intubation, and Cormack and Lehane grades yielded the highest positive predictive value for predicting easy intubation.Mallampati classification is an appropriate screening test for predicting easy intubation.Predictive value of the El-Ganzouri multivariate risk index for difficult tracheal intubation: a comparison of Glidescope videolaryngoscopy and conventional Macintosh laryngoscopy.The predictive value of the El-Ganzouri risk index (EGRI) for difficult intubation has been evaluated using Macintosh laryngoscopy as reference standard. The Glidescope videolaryngoscope provides improved visualization of the glottis. We studied the predictive value of the EGRI using videolaryngoscopy as reference standard.Data from two subsequent groups of patients, intubated with Macintosh laryngoscopy (ML, n = 994) and videolaryngoscopy (VL, n = 843), were retrospectively analysed. The EGRI was taken as index test. The two types of laryngoscopy were adopted as reference for the presence of Cormack and Lehane grading III-IV. For both groups, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative post-test probabilities (PTP) were calculated for thresholds on the EGRI scale. Receiver operating characteristic curves and corresponding areas (AUC) were obtained.Sensitivity and specificity were 69.7% and 66.3% at the cut-off value of 2 in the ML group, and 93.3% and 76.6% at the cut-off value of 3 in the VL group. Corresponding positive and negative PTP were 12.81% and 3.15% in the ML group, and 6.73% and 0.16% in the VL group. At the threshold of 4, positive and negative PTP were 31.34% and 4.85% in the ML group. At the threshold of 7, positive and negative PTP were 85.71% and 1.08% in the VL group. The AUC was 0.74 in the ML group and 0.91 in the VL group.The predictive value of the EGRI may have been underestimated due to limited accuracy of Macintosh laryngoscopy. Using videolaryngoscopy, the EGRI might be reconsidered as a decisional tool.The extended Mallampati score and a diagnosis of diabetes mellitus are predictors of difficult laryngoscopy in the morbidly obese.The modified Mallampati (MMP) classification is a standard method of oropharyngeal evaluation for predicting difficult laryngoscopy. Previous studies have demonstrated that the predictive value of the MMP is improved when the patient's craniocervical junction is extended rather than neutral (Extended Mallampati Score, EMS). In the present study, we compared the predictive value of the MMP and EMS in the morbidly obese.We performed a prospective study of adult patients with a Body Mass Index (BMI) > or = 40 over a 12-mo period comparing the MMP and EMS. The performance of the MMP, EMS, and other commonly used tests was compared for the ability to predict difficult laryngoscopy, defined as a Cormack-Lehane grade of 3 or 4. Positioning and direct laryngoscopic techniques were not standardized. The incidence of difficult laryngoscopy and difficult intubation was compared in patients with BMI > or = or < 40.Three-hundred-forty-six patients with a BMI > or = 40 were evaluated with both the MMP and EMS and received direct laryngoscopy. On average, craniocervical extension decreased the MMP class (P < 0.0001). Compared to the MMP, the EMS improved specificity and predictive value while maintaining sensitivity. Compared to the MMP and other tests, an EMS class of 3 or 4 and a diagnosis of diabetes mellitus were the only statistically significant predictors of difficult laryngoscopy in the morbidly obese. There was no difference in the incidence of difficult laryngoscopy or intubation in the morbidly obese compared to patients with a BMI < 40.The EMS was superior to the MMP in the prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in the morbidly obese population. A diagnosis of diabetes mellitus also warrants further investigation as a predictor of difficult laryngoscopy in this population. Finally, this study supports previous findings that morbid obesity is not itself a predictor of difficult laryngoscopy or intubation.Rapid sequence induction for appendectomies: a retrospective case-review analysis.Rapid sequence induction (RSI) with cricoid pressure is suggested to decrease the risk of aspiration of gastric contents. However, the effectiveness of RSI has been questioned, and the technique may lead to airway and hemodynamic complications. The purpose of this study was to determine the frequency of RSI use in patients with acute appendicitis, the types of drugs administered, and the occurrence of any complications.After approval by the Ethics Committee, the charts of patients undergoing appendectomy in a one-year period were examined retrospectively. Information was retrieved on Mallampati airway evaluation, airway device used, preoxygenation, RSI, and drugs at induction. Reported complications were noted, including airway difficulties, hypotension (systolic blood pressure < 80 mmHg) and hypertension (>160 mmHg) in the 20-min period after induction.General anesthesia with tracheal intubation was used in 248 of 250 cases reviewed. The Mallampati airway evaluation, preoxygenation, and RSI were recorded as performed in 95, 94, and 81% of cases, respectively. Opioids, propofol, and neuromuscular blocking agents were given in 98, 98, and 99% of patients, respectively. Succinylcholine use was common (80%), with 96% of these patients receiving rocuronium precurarization. Difficult intubation with successful alternate technique was encountered in three patients (1.2%). Hypotension and hypertension occurred in 27% and 8% of patients, respectively. There were no documented cases of aspiration. Oxygen desaturation was mentioned in one case at induction and in three cases at emergence.An RSI with opioid, induction agent, and succinylcholine is the technique of choice for appendectomies at our institution. The frequency of airway complications is too low to recommend a change in practice.[Diagnostic utility of the hyomental distance ratio as predictor of difficult intubation at UMAE 25].The hyomental distance ratio is defined as the ratio of the hyomental distances in neutral position and at head extension. The aim of the study was to establish the diagnostic utility as predictor of difficult intubation.In a cross-sectional study, the assessment of the airway was performed in 70 patients (35 male and 35 female, 15-75 years old) undergoing general anesthesia with endotracheal intubation for elective surgery. We assessed Mallampati, Patil Aldreti, interincisive distance, Bellhouse Doré scales and hyomental distance ratio. Subsequently, laryngoscopy was performed and the view graded with Cormack scale. We define "difficult intubation" as Cormack III and IV. We determined the diagnostic utility of the scales and the hyomental distance ratio.For hyomental distance ratio of ≤ 1.2 we calculated sensitivity, 60%; specificity, 20%; positive predictive value, 5%; negative predictive value, 86%; positive likelihood ratio of 0.75 and negative likelihood ratio of 2.The hyomental distance ratio, as predictor of difficult intubation, has little utility.Can difficult intubation be easily and rapidly predicted?Failed endotracheal intubation and inadequate ventilation with subsequent insufficient oxygenation can result in serious complications potentially leading to permanent health damage. Difficult intubation may occur not only in patients with apparent pathologies in the orofacial region but also, unexpectedly, in those without abnormalities. This study aimed at finding anthropometric parameters that are easy to examine and that would aid in predicting difficult intubation.A case-control study was undertaken. Based on defined criteria, 15 parameters were examined in patients with unanticipated difficult intubation. The parameters included a previous history of difficult intubation, pathologies associated with difficult intubation, clinical symptoms of airway pathology, the Mallampati score, upper lip bite test, receding mandible, and cervical spine and temporomandibular joint movement. Thyromental, hyomental and sternomental distances and inter-incisor gap were measured. The methods were precisely defined and the measurements were carried out by a trained anesthesiologist. Statistical analysis was performed on data from 74 patients with difficult intubation and 74 control patients with easy intubation.Significant predictors of difficult intubation were inter-incisor gap (IIG), thyromental distance (TMD) and class 3 limited movement of the temporomandibular joint. The IIG and TMD cut-offs were set at 42 mm and 93 mm, respectively.The results will be used to confirm these predictors in an anesthesiology clinic along with the aid of the laryngoscopic findings to improve the prediction of unanticipated difficult intubation.BMI as a Predictor for Potential Difficult Tracheal Intubation in Males.Difficult tracheal intubation is a common source of mortality and morbidity in surgical and critical care settings. The incidence reported of difficult tracheal intubation is 0.1%-13% and reaches 14% in the obese population. The objective of our retrospective study was to investigate and compare the utility of body mass index (BMI) as indicator of difficult tracheal intubation in males and females.We performed a retrospective chart review of patients who underwent abdominal surgeries with American Society of Anesthesiologists I to V under general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation. The following information was obtained from medical records for analysis: gender, age, height, weight, BMI, length of patient stay in the Post Anesthesia Care Unit, past medical history of sleep apnea, Mallampati score, and the American Society of Anesthesiologists classification assigned by the anesthesia care provider performing the endotracheal intubation.Of 4303 adult patients, 1970 (45.8%) men and 2333 (54.2%) women were enrolled in the study. Within this group, a total of 1673 (38.9%) patients were morbidly obese. The average age of the study group was 51.4 ± 15.8 and the average BMI was 29.7 ± 8.2 kg/m(2). The overall incidence of the encountered difficult intubations was 5.23% or 225 subjects. Thus, our results indicate that BMI is a reliable predictor of difficult tracheal intubation predominantly in the male population; another strong predictor, with a positive linear correlation, being the Mallampati score.In conclusion, our data shows that BMI is a reliable indicator of potential difficult tracheal intubation only in male surgical patients.Difficult intubation in acromegalic patients: incidence and predictability.Previous studies have suggested that the incidence of difficult intubation in acromegalic patients is higher than in normal patients. However, these studies were retrospective and did not include preoperative assessment of the airways. The aims of this study were to determine the incidence of difficult intubation and to assess the usefulness of preoperative tests in predicting difficult laryngoscopy.One hundred twenty-eight consenting acromegalic patients requiring general anesthesia and tracheal intubation were studied. Preoperatively, Mallampati classification, thyromental distance, and head and neck movement were determined in each patient. After induction of anesthesia and muscle paralysis, laryngoscopic grade was assessed during direct laryngoscopy; Cormack and Lehane grade III or IV were classified as difficult. The association of individual airway assessment with laryngeal view was evaluated using the Fisher exact test. Predictors of difficult laryngoscopy were evaluated by calculating their sensitivity and specificity.Laryngoscopy was difficult (grade III) in 33 of 128 patients (26%). Application of external laryngeal pressure improved laryngeal visualization to grade II in 20 of these 33 patients. In the remaining 13 patients (10%), intubation was difficult (more than two attempts, blade change, use of gum-elastic bougie). Mallampati classes 3 and 4 were significantly related to laryngoscopy grade III (Fisher exact test, P = 0.001).The incidence of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation in acromegalic patients is higher than in normal patients. Preoperative Mallampati scores of 3 and 4 were of value in predicting difficult laryngoscopy. Nevertheless, even this test will miss a significant number of patients with a difficult airway.A comparison of the upper lip bite test with hyomental/thyrosternal distances and mandible length in predicting difficulty in intubation: A prospective study.The incidence of difficulty in tracheal intubation has been reported to range from 0.5 to 18% in patients undergoing surgery. We aimed to elucidate the role of upper lip bite test (ULBT) with other prevailing tests, hyomental/thyrosternal distances (HMD/TSD), and the mandible length (ML) and their possible correlation in predicting difficulty in intubation. After institutional approval and informed consent were obtained, 300 consecutive patients aged 20-60 years of ASA physical status I and II, scheduled for elective surgical procedures requiring tracheal intubation and meeting the inclusion criteria, were enrolled in this study. Each patient was evaluated regarding ULBT, HMD, TSD and ML. Laryngoscopy was assessed by an attending anaesthesiologist blinded to the measurements. The laryngoscopic result was graded according to Cormack and Lehane's Grading system. The negative predictive value (NPV) and positive predictive value (PPV) of ULBT were found to be 94 and 100%, respectively. These corresponding figures for TSD were 88.5 and 0%, respectively. Specificities for ULBT, HMD, ML and TSD were 100, 98.9, 98.9 and 98.1%, respectively. ULBT class and laryngoscopic grading showed the greatest agreement (kappa = 0.61, P < 0.001). An agreement between laryngoscopic grading and HMD and ML also existed (0.003 and <0.001, respectively), but was comparatively weaker. The high specificity, NPV, PPV and accuracy of ULBT as revealed in this study could be a good rationale for its application in the prediction of difficulty or easiness in intubation. ML > 9 cm and HMD > 3.5 cm were good predictors of negative difficult intubation.Goitre and difficulty of tracheal intubation.To assess the difficulty in both laryngoscopy and tracheal intubation related to goitre and to identify factors predictive of difficult intubation due to this condition.Prospective observational.We used the Intubation Difficulty Scale (IDS) in 80 consecutive patients with large goitre (defined by the inability to palpate the cricoid cartilage, the presence of endothoracic goitre, tracheal deviation of more than 1cm or tracheal stenosis on the chest x-ray) and 77 control patients.Cormack grades 3-4 were more frequent at initial laryngoscopy in patients with goitre (23/80 vs. 9/77; p<0.05), but the difference was no longer significant after application of an external laryngeal pressure (8/80 vs. 5/77). IDS scores (median [25th-75th percentiles]) were higher in the goitre group (1 [0 - 4]) than in the control group (0 [0 - 1]; p=0.001), corresponding to an increase in slightly difficult intubation (IDS 1-5: 36/80 vs. 15/77; p<0.05). However, incidence of moderate to major difficulty in intubation (IDS>5: 8/80 vs. 7/77) as well as time to completion of intubation were similar in both groups. Tracheal stenosis (> or =30%) and reduced mouth opening (<4.4cm) were the only significant predictors of increased difficulty in intubation in patients with a goitre.Large goitres are usually associated with slight difficulty in intubation only. Increased difficulty should be expected when severe tracheal stenosis is present on chest x-ray, especially when associated with a reduced mouth opening.A comparison of the ratio of patient's height to thyromental distance with the modified Mallampati and the upper lip bite test in predicting difficult laryngoscopy.THE AIM OF THE PRESENT STUDY WAS TO COMPARE THE ABILITY TO PREDICT DIFFICULT VISUALIZATION OF THE LARYNX FROM THE FOLLOWING PREOPERATIVE AIRWAY PREDICTIVE INDICES, IN ISOLATION AND COMBINATION: modified Mallampati test (MMT), the ratio of height to thyromental distance (RHTMD) and the Upper-Lip-Bite test (ULBT).We collected data on 603 consecutive patients scheduled for elective surgery under general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation and then evaluated all three factors before surgery. An experienced anesthesiologist, not informed of the recorded preoperative airway evaluation, performed the laryngoscopy and grading (as per Cormack and Lehane's classification). Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value, Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) Curve and the area under ROC curve (AUC) for each airway predictor in isolation and in combination were determined.Difficult laryngoscopy (Grade 3 or 4) occurred in 41 (6.8%) patients. The main endpoint of the present study, the AUC of the ROC, was significantly lower for the MMT (AUC, 0.511; 95% CI, 0.470-0.552) than the ULBT (AUC, 0.709; 95% CI, 0.671-0.745, P=0.002) and the RHTMD score (AUC, 0.711; 95% CI, 0.673-0.747, P=0.001). There was no significant difference between the AUC of the ROC for the ULBT and the RHTMD score. By using discrimination analysis, the optimal cutoff point for the RHTMD for predicting difficult laryngoscopy was 21.06 (sensitivity, 75.6%; specificity, 58.5%).The RHTMD is comparable with ULBT for prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in general population.Difficult prehospital endotracheal intubation - predisposing factors in a physician based EMS.For experienced personnel endotracheal intubation (ETI) is the gold standard to secure the airway in prehospital emergency medicine. Nevertheless, substantial procedural difficulties have been reported with a significant potential to compromise patients' outcomes. Systematic evaluation of ETI in paramedic operated emergency medical systems (EMS) and in a mixed physician/anaesthetic nurse EMS showed divergent results. In our study we systematically assessed factors associated with difficult ETI in an EMS exclusively operating with physicians.Over a 1-year period we prospectively collected data on the specific conditions of all ETIs of two physician staffed EMS vehicles. Difficult ETI was defined by more than 3 attempts or a difficult visualisation of the larynx (Cormack and Lehane grade 3, or worse). For each patient ETI conditions, biophysical characteristics and factors of the surrounding scene were assessed. Additionally, physicians were asked whether they had expected difficult ETI in advance.Out of 3979 treated patients 305 (7.7%) received ETI. For 276 patients complete data sets were available. The incidence of difficult ETI was 13.0%. In 4 cases (1.4%) ETI was impossible, but no patient was unable to be ventilated sufficiently. Predicting conditions for difficult intubation were limited surrounding space on scene (p<0.01), short neck (p<0.01), obesity (p<0.01), face and neck injuries (p<0.01), mouth opening<3 cm (p<0.01) and known ankylosing spondylitis (p<0.01). ETI on the floor or with C-spine immobilisation in situ were of no significant influence. The incidence of unexpected difficult ETI was 5.0%.In a physician staffed EMS difficult prehospital ETI occurred in 13% of cases. Predisposing factors were limited surrounding space on scene and certain biophysical conditions of the patient (short neck, obesity, face and neck injuries, and anatomical restrictions). Unexpected difficult ETI occurred in 5% of the cases.Predicting difficult intubation.Two pre-operative tests for the prediction of difficult intubation are assessed. A modified Mallampati test and a measurement of thyromental distance were performed at the pre-operative visit of 244 patients whose tracheas were subsequently intubated under general anaesthesia. Patients in whom the posterior pharyngeal wall could not be visualised below the soft palate, who also had a distance of less than 7 cm between the prominence of the thyroid cartilage and the bony point of the chin proved significantly more likely to present difficulty with intubation. The performance of these two simple tests on all patients before operation should allow the majority of cases of difficult intubation to be anticipated.The palm print as a sensitive predictor of difficult laryngoscopy in diabetics: a comparison with other airway evaluation indices.To evaluate the ink impression made by the palm of the dominant hand as a screening tool for difficult laryngoscopy in diabetic patients.In this prospective study, airway of 50 adult diabetic patients, undergoing elective surgery under general anaesthesia, was assessed preoperatively using the common clinical indices such as Modified Mallampati test, thyromental distance, degree of head extension and a specific index- the palm print test. Following induction of anaesthesia and neuromuscular relaxation, laryngoscopy was performed and the laryngoscopic view scored. The sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of each airway evaluation index were calculated.The incidence of difficult laryngoscopy was 16%. The palm print test had the highest sensitivity (75%) of all the indices. The thyromental distance less than six cm had the highest specificity (95.2%) but was least sensitive (25%). 87% of patients with difficult laryngoscopy had two or more indices abnormal.Though the palm print test was the most sensitive index of the four indices studied, a better prediction of difficult laryngoscopy can be achieved by evaluating all the four airway indices preoperatively.Prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in obese patients by ultrasound quantification of anterior neck soft tissue.In 50 morbidly obese patients, we quantified the soft tissue of the neck from the skin to the anterior aspect of the trachea at the vocal cords using ultrasound. Thyromental distance, mouth opening, limited neck mobility, modified Mallampati score, abnormal upper teeth, neck circumference and sleep apnoea were assessed as predictors of difficult laryngoscopy. Of the nine (18%) cases of difficult laryngoscopy, seven (78%) had a history of obstructive sleep apnoea, compared with two of the 41 patients (5%) in whom laryngoscopy was easy (p < 0.001). Patients in whom laryngoscopy was difficult had more pretracheal soft tissue (mean (SD) 28 (2.7) mm vs. 17.5 (1.8) mm; p < 0.001) and a greater neck circumference (50 (3.8) vs. 43.5 (2.2) cm; p < 0.001). None of the other predictors correlated with difficult laryngoscopy. We conclude that an abundance of pretracheal soft tissue at the level of the vocal cords is a good predictor of difficult laryngoscopy in obese patients.Predictive factors of difficult airway with known assessment scales.difficult intubation is defined as the need for more than three attempts for intubation or more than 10 min to accomplish it, a situation that occurs in 1.5-8% of general anesthetic procedures. The aim of this study was to evaluate the predictive factors of difficult airway with known assessment scales.in a cross-sectional study conducted in 184 patients during the pre-anesthetic evaluation, we assessed the oral opening, viewing pharyngeal structures (Mallampati scale), condition of teeth, anatomic chin and neck, head extension and neck flexion (normal or limited), thyromental distance (Patil-Aldreti test) and the presence of obesity. We performed a calculation of sensitivity (S), specificity (Sp), positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) using contingency tables.we found that grades III and IV Mallapati (84%) and limited extension and flexion of the head and neck (99%) showed a high specificity for predicting difficult intubation. Other factors associated with difficult intubation were related to micrognathia, limited mouth opening and teeth with anatomic abnormalities.it is essential to take the necessary time to assess the airway with the greatest number of criteria predictive of difficult intubation for the person performing the procedure in order to take the necessary steps to face difficulties in this technique.Prediction of difficult tracheal intubation in Turkish patients: a multi-center methodological study.Preoperative evaluation is important in the detection of patients at risk for difficult airway management. It is still unclear whether true prediction is possible and which variables should be chosen for evaluation. The aim of this prospective, multi-centre study was to investigate the incidence of difficult intubation, the sensitivity and positive predictive values of clinical screening tests and whether combining two or more of these tests will improve the prediction of difficult intubation in Turkish patients.Seven study sites from six regions in Turkey participated in this study. One thousand six hundred and seventy-four ASA physical status I-III patients, scheduled to undergo elective surgery under general anaesthesia, were included.The incidence of difficult intubation was 4.8% and increased with age (P < 0.05). The incidence of difficult intubation was significantly higher in patients who had a Mallampati III or IV score, a decreased average thyromental and sternomental distance, decreased mouth opening, or decreased protrusion of the mandible (P < 0.05). Mouth opening and Mallampati III-IV were found to be the most sensitive criteria when used alone (43% and 35%, respectively). Combination of tests did not improve these results.There is still no individual test or a combination of tests that predict difficult intubations accurately. Tests with higher specificity despite low positive predictive value are needed.The importance of increased neck circumference to intubation difficulties in obese patients.Using the intubation difficulty scale (IDS), we sought to confirm that obese patients are more difficult to intubate than lean patients. We assessed classical bedside tests and included neck circumference.We prospectively compared the incidence of difficult tracheal intubation in 70 obese [body mass index (BMI) > or = 30 kg/m(2)] and 61 lean patients (BMI < 30 kg/m(2)). The IDS scores, categorized as difficult intubation (IDS > 5) or not (IDS < or = 5), and the patient data, were compared between lean and obese patients. Preoperative measurements [BMI, neck circumference (at the level of the thyroid cartilage), width of mouth opening, sternomental distance, and thyromental distance], medical history of obstructive sleep apnea syndrome, and several scores (Mallampati, Wilson, El Ganzouri) were recorded. The view during direct laryngoscopy was graded, and the IDS was recorded. We then compared patients with IDS < or = 5 and > 5, concerning each item.The results indicate that difficult tracheal intubation is more frequent in obese than in lean patients (14.3% vs 3%; P = 0.03). In the patients with IDS > 5, thyromental distance, BMI, large neck circumference, and higher Mallampati score were the only predictors of potential intubation problems.We found that problematic intubation was associated with thyromental distance, increasing neck circumference, BMI, and a Mallampati score of > or = 3. Neck circumference should be assessed preoperatively to predict difficult intubation.[The Mallampati Score. Prediction of difficult intubation in otolaryngologic laser surgery by Mallampati Score].The Mallampati score (MS), later modified by Samsoon and Young, is a common method used to predict difficult intubation. We tested its predictive value in otolaryngologic (ENT) laser surgery.Ninety-one patients scheduled for elective ENT laser surgery had the modified MS noted prior to induction in the supine position, with the tongue fully protruded and phonating "ah"; 22 patients were female, 69 male. The mean age was 54 +/- 15 (6-84) years, height 171 +/- 9 (130-190) cm, and weight 72 +/- 21 (20-99) kg. After a standard induction, the laryngoscopic view was graded according to Cormack and Lehane (C&L). An intubation was considered difficult if the C&L score was > or = 3, i.e., no part of the glottis seen during laryngoscopy. The hypothesis tested was that a MS > or = 3 (i.e., only the base of the uvula or nine of the uvula was seen) is predictive of difficult intubation in this group of patients. This chi-square test was used for calculation of significance.All intubations were performed in less than three attempts, and no C&L score of 4 (i.e., not even the epiglottis seen during laryngoscopy) was observed; 10 patients had a C&L score > or = 3, i.e., a difficult intubation according to our definition. Sixty-two patients had a MS < or = 2; of these, 4 (= 6%) were difficult to intubate. Twenty-nine patients had MS > or = 3; of these, 6 (= 21%) were difficult to intubate. This difference was significant (chi-square = 4.1, P < 0.05).Difficult intubation was significantly more common in patients with MS > or = 3. Low sensitivity (60%) and specificity (72%) limit the clinical value of this test, however.Prospective validation of the modified LEMON criteria to predict difficult intubation in the ED.Evidence to predict difficult intubation remains scarce in the emergency department (ED) setting. A previously defined clinical decision rule, the modified LEMON criteria, may provide a reliable and reproducible means of identifying difficult intubations. We aimed to prospectively evaluate the external validity of the modified LEMON criteria in the EDs.We conducted a 13-center prospective observational study, the second Japanese Emergency Airway Network study. We prospectively collected data on all patients undergoing intubations in the ED from February 2012 through September 2014. The primary outcomes were sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of the modified LEMON criteria for predicting difficult intubation (≥2 attempts by emergency attending physicians or anesthesiologists).The database recorded a total of 4034 encounters (capture rate, 96%) in the EDs. Of these, 3313 patients (84%) underwent the intubation attempt with a direct laryngoscope and 610 patients (16%) with a video laryngoscope. The proportion of difficult intubation was 5.4% (95% confidence interval [CI], 4.7%-6.2%) in the direct laryngoscope group and 7.4% (95% CI, 5.6%-9.7%) in the video laryngoscope group. The sensitivity was 85.7% (95% CI, 79.3%-90.4%) with direct laryngoscope and 94.9% (95% CI, 83.5%-98.6%) with video laryngoscope. The specificity was 47.6% (95% CI, 47.2%-47.9%) and 40.3% (95% CI, 39.4%-40.6%), respectively. The negative predictive value was 98.2% (95% CI, 97.5%-98.8%) and 99.0% (95% CI, 96.6%-99.7%), respectively.In this multicenter prospective study, we found a high sensitivity and a negative predictive value of the modified LEMON criteria for predicting difficult intubation. The modified LEMON might assist ED providers in better identifying difficult intubations.Difficult intubation: thyromental distance and the atlanto-occipital gap.Ten patients with a history of difficult intubation and 10 control patients were examined clinically and radiologically. It was shown that thyromental distance can be measured reliably clinically and further support is given to its usefulness as a predictor of difficult intubation. We were unable to demonstrate a conclusive link between thyromental distance and atlanto-occipital or atlanto-axial gaps. A review of X rays in other collections may add to the understanding of these factors in difficult intubation.Prevalence and prediction of difficult intubation in Chinese women.We conducted a prospective, blind observational study to investigate the prevalence and prediction of difficult intubation in Chinese women. Two groups of Chinese women were studied (151 pregnant and 260 non-pregnant). The prevalence of difficult intubation was 1.99% in the pregnant and 1.54% in the non-pregnant group. The difference was not statistically significant. Predictive variables for difficult intubation, including modified Mallampati class, thyromental distance and atlanto-occipital extension, had high sensitivity but low positive predictive value when used alone. A shorter thyromental distance had to be used as the criterion for prediction in Chinese women. Combination of predictive variables could improve the positive predictive value.Predicting difficult intubation--a comprehensive scoring system.A study was conducted in an attempt to devise a simple and more accurate method of predicting difficult intubation. Prospective assessments were made in 282 patients and retrospective assessment in 16 patients with regard to 21 anatomical factors which were correlated with the laryngoscopic view at intubation. Twelve factors correlated significantly with difficult intubation. Four of these were eliminated after multifactorial analysis. A scoring system was devised, assigning points to each variable based on its discriminative value. A score of 6 or more correctly identified 22 out of the 23 difficult intubations and there were 50 false positives (sensitivity, specificity and PPV of 96%, 82% and 31% respectively). When negative scoring was done for factors favouring easy intubation, false positives were reduced to 36, but only 20 difficult cases could be identified correctly.The palm print as a sensitive predictor of difficult laryngoscopy in diabetics.Grading of the ink impression made by the palm of the hand has been proposed as a means of screening diabetic patients in whom tracheal intubation may be difficult because of glycosylation of both metacarpal and cervical joints. The current study was designed to test the predictability of the palm print and other airway evaluation indices in a diabetic population.83 adult, diabetic patients scheduled for surgery under general anesthesia were evaluated preoperatively using 4 physical examination indices predictive of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation: Mallampati classification, thyromental distance, head extension, and palm print. Following induction of anesthesia and neuromuscular relaxation, laryngoscopy was performed and the laryngoscopic view scored. The sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of each airway evaluation index was calculated.The palm print had the highest sensitivity of all indices (100%). The other 3 indices failed to detect 9 to 13 difficult laryngoscopies.We believe that in the diabetic population, the palm print index may be a sensitive marker of difficult intubation. It is possible that other airway evaluation indices would prove more sensitive, and have greater utility, in distinct populations as compared to when they are applied to all patients.Screening tests for predicting difficult intubation. A clinical assessment in Turkish patients.Three methods of predicting difficult intubation were compared prospectively. Mallampati test, Wilson risk-sum and thyromental distance were determined preoperatively and laryngeal views were graded in 500 patients. The sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values of each test were calculated. The incidence of difficult intubation was found to be 8%. The sensitivities of the Mallampati test, the Wilson risk-sum and the thyromental distance were 43%, 58% and 35% respectively, and the specificities were 93%, 91% and 95% respectively. Significant differences were seen between the sensitivities of the Mallampati test and the Wilson risk-sum (P < 0.001), the Wilson risk-sum and the thyromental distance (P < 0.001), the Mallampati test and the thyromental distance (P < 0.05). Among the different specificities, the only significant difference was observed between the Wilson risk-sum and the thyromental distance (P < 0.05). There were no significant differences between the positive and negative predictive values of the three screening tests (P > 0.05). In conclusion, the Wilson risk-sum was the most sensitive test and the thyromental distance has the highest positive predictive value for difficult intubation.Prediction of ease of laryngoscopy and intubation-role of upper lip bite test, modified mallampati classification, and thyromental distance in various combination.The incidence of difficult intubation in patients undergoing general anaesthesia is estimated to be approximately 1-18% whereas that of failure to intubate is 0.05-0.35%.1,2,3 Various methods have been used for prediction of difficult laryngoscopy. Although, upper lip bite has been shown to be a promising test in its introductory article, repeated validation in various populations is required for any test to be accepted as a routine test. We have compared upper lip bite test (ULBT), modified Mallampati test (MMC) and thyromental distance (TMD) individually and in various combinations to verify which of these predictor tests are significantly associated with difficult glottic exposure.After obtaining institutional ethics committee approval, 402 ASA I and II adult patients undergoing elective surgical procedures requiring endotracheal intubation were included. All the three test were performed in all the patients preoperatively and their glottic exposure was recorded by Cormack-Lehane classification during intubation. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were used for comparison.In our study, the incidence of difficult laryngoscopy was 11.4% and failure to intubate 0.49%. None of the three are a suitable predictive test when used alone. Combination of tests added incremental diagnostic value.We conclude that all three screening tests for difficult intubation have only poor to moderate discriminative power when used alone. Combinations of individual tests add some incremental diagnostic value.Predictive value of bedside tests for difficult intubations.The aim of this study is to find the ideal test(s) for the prediction of difficult laryngoscopic intubation.One hundred and twenty patients were selected at random for this prospective observational study. The patients' preoperative exams include the assessment of Mallampati classification, thyromental, sternomental, interincisor distances and neck circumference. The laryngoscopy was evaluated with using the Cormack Lehane classification. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy of tests, alone and in combination, were assessed.No statistically significant difference was found between the difficult and easy intubation cases. Sternomental distance showed the highest sensitivity (76%) and positive predictor value (54%). As the critical value of neck circumference was set to 35 cm and above, the sensitivity was 74% and positive predictive value, 53%. For the neck circumference and sternomental distance combination, which is determined to be the most reliable and accurate criteria, the sensitivity was 62% and positive predictive value, 42%.The findings suggest that the sternomental distance and neck circumference combination may be a more accurate predictor of difficult intubation.Validation of modified Mallampati test with addition of thyromental distance and sternomental distance to predict difficult endotracheal intubation in adults.Intubation is often a challenge for anaesthesiologists. Many parameters assist to predict difficult intubation. The present study was undertaken to assess the validity of different parameters in predicting difficult intubation for general anaesthesia (GA) in adults and effect of combining the parameters on the validity.The anaesthesiologist assessed oropharynx of 135 adult patients. Modified Mallampati test (MMT) was used and the thyromental distance (TMD) and sternomental distances (SMD) for each of the patients were also measured. The Cormack and Lehane laryngoscopic grading was assessed following laryngoscopy. The validity parameters such as sensitivity, specificity, false positive and negatives values, positive and negative predictive values were calculated. The effect of combining different measurements on the validity was also studied. Univariate analysis was performed using the parametric method.The study group comprised of 135 patients. The sensitivity and specificity of MMT were 28.6% and 93%, respectively. The TMD (<6.5 CM) had sensitivity and specificity of 100% and 75.8%, respectively. The SMD (<12.5 CM) had sensitivity and specificity of 91% and 92.7%, respectively. Combination of MMT grading and TMD and SMD measurements increased the validity (sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 92.7%).MMT had high specificity. The validity of combination of MMT, SMD and TMD as compared to MMT alone was very high in predicting difficult intubation in adult patients. All parameters should be used in assessing an adult patient for surgery under GA.Modified Mallampati test and thyromental distance as a predictor of difficult laryngoscopy in Thai patients.Preoperative evaluation of anatomical landmarks and clinical factors are important in the detection of patients at risk for difficult laryngoscopy. The modified Mallampati test (MMT) and thyromental distance (TMD) are commonly used for this purpose but there are controversies regarding their accuracy.The objective of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of MMT and TMD in the prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in Thai patients.1888 consecutive patients undergoing general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation were evaluated preoperatively using the MMT and TMD. The cut-off points for the difficult airway predictors were: Mallampati 3, 4 and TMD less than 6 cm. During direct laryngoscopy, the laryngeal view was graded using the Cormack and Lehane (CL) classification. CL grades III and IV were considered difficult laryngoscopy. Sensitivity and specificity for each airway predictor in isolation and in combination were determined.The present study found Mallampati grade I 1050 patients (55.6%), grade II 730 patients (38.7%), grade III 104 patients (5.5%), grade IV 4 pateints (0.2%) and TMD less than 6 cm 85 patients (4.5%), TMD more than 6 cm 1803 patients (95.5%). Difficult laryngoscopy occurred in 60 patients (3.2%). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) for the two airway predictors were: MMT 41.7%, 95.5%, 23.1% and 98.0% and TMD 23.3%, 96.1%, 16.5% and 97.4% respectively. The combination of two predictors with a sensitivity, specificity PPV and NPV were 55.0%, 92.3%, 19.1% and 98.4%.MMT TMD and their combination are good predictors of difficult laryngoscopy in a Thai population.Risk Factors Assessment of the Difficult Intubation using Intubation Difficulty Scale (IDS).The major responsibility of anaesthesiologist is to maintain adequate gas exchange in his patients in all circumstances and this require that patency of upper airway is constantly maintained. Problems with upper airway management are among the most frequent causes of anaesthetic mishaps. Using intubation difficulty scale (IDS) we made an attempt to objectively assess the predictors of difficult intubation. We assessed classical bedside tests such as modified Mallampati test, Thyromental distance test and also neck extension test.We prospectively observed 400 patients undergoing general anaesthesia with endotracheal intubation, for each patient intubation difficulty score was recorded during intubation. Risk factors assessment of difficult intubation done using IDS. Risk factor assessed includes modified mallampati class III and IV, thyromental distance ≤ 6cm and neck extension < 5cm. Patients were categorised as Easy intubation (IDS, 0 to 2), slightly difficult intubation (IDS, 3 to 4) and difficult intubation (IDS 5). Preoperative airway assessment was done by thyromental distance measurement, neck extension measurement and modified mallampati test. Data was analysed using Receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) and area under curve (AUC) for each test computed. p<0.05 was considered significant.The incidence of difficult intubation was 8% and there were no failure to intubate the trachea. The AUC were as follows: modified Mallampati test 0.473 (p<0.005), Thyromental distance test 0.753 (p<0.005) and neck extension test 0.768 (p<0.005).The results indicate that neck extension test is strongest predictor of difficult intubation (IDS≥5) in comparison to Thyromental test and modified mallampati test.Predicting difficult orotracheal intubation in pharyngo-laryngeal disease: preliminary results of a composite index.Prediction of difficulty in orotracheal intubation (DI) in patients undergoing laryngeal microsurgery should help reduce the morbidity-mortality associated with this clinical situation. To establish a simple score to predict this difficulty, we studied 11 variables and their association with DI in these patients.The study included 181 patients. The variables evaluated were: Mallampati grade, thyromental distance, mouth opening, temporomandibular joint movement, tooth morphology, maxillary deficiency, head and neck movement, receding mandible, body mass index, and clinical symptoms of laryngeal and supraglottic disease. To establish the score, regression coefficients of the statistically significant variables were used on adjusted logistic regression analysis.DI was present in 50 patients (28%) and orotracheal intubation was impossible in four (2%). Except for obesity, all the variables evaluated were predictive of DI. A simple predictive test was established based on logistic regression analysis including all the variables except temporomandibular joint movement. To determine the optimum cut-off for the new test, a receiver operating characteristic curve analysis was applied. A score > or = 5 in the proposed test provided a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 76%.The index we describe is aimed at predicting DI in a very specific population with a high risk of this complication. This index uses a series of variables which may be measured easily during the preoperative period and provides an excellent predictive capacity with a high sensitivity and specificity when the index is > or = 5.A comparison of the upper lip bite test (a simple new technique) with modified Mallampati classification in predicting difficulty in endotracheal intubation: a prospective blinded study.We explored the possibility that a simple and single test could replace the modified Mallampati score for either a difficult or an unaccomplished tracheal intubation in an impending hypoxic patient. Three hundred adult patients were enrolled in this study. They were subjected to the following assessments: 1) oropharyngeal class according to the modified Mallampati criteria; 2) the new, upper lip bite criteria-class I = lower incisors can bite the upper lip above the vermilion line, class II = lower incisors can bite the upper lip below the vermilion line, and class III = lower incisors cannot bite the upper lip; and 3) laryngeal view grading according to Cormack's criteria. The incidence of difficult intubation was 5.7%. The upper lip bite test showed significantly higher specificity and accuracy than the modified Mallampati test (P < 0.001). Comparisons of sensitivity, positive and negative predictive values, between the two tests, however, did not reveal any significant differences (P > 0.05). In conclusion, the upper lip bite test is an acceptable option for predicting difficult intubation as a simple, single test.A documented previous difficult tracheal intubation as a prognostic test for a subsequent difficult tracheal intubation in adults.We investigated the diagnostic accuracy of a documented previous difficult tracheal intubation as a stand-alone test for predicting a subsequent difficult intubation. Our assessment included patients from the Danish Anaesthesia Database who were scheduled for tracheal intubation by direct laryngoscopy. We used a four-point scale to grade the tracheal intubation. A previous difficult intubation was defined according to the presence of a record documenting a difficult penultimate tracheal intubation-score for the 15 499 patients anaesthetised more than once. Our assessment demonstrates that a documented history of previous difficult or failed intubation using direct laryngoscopy are strong predictors of a subsequent difficult or failed intubation and may identify 30% of these patients. Although previous investigators have reported predictive values that exceed our findings markedly, a documented previous difficult or failed tracheal intubation appears in everyday anaesthetic practice to be a strong predictor of a subsequent difficult tracheal intubation.Incidences and predictors of difficult laryngoscopy in adult patients undergoing general anesthesia : a single-center analysis of 102,305 cases.Hypoxemia caused by difficulties in airway management presents a major cause for perioperative morbidity and mortality. The ability to predict difficult laryngoscopy more accurately would enable anesthesiologists to take specific precautions to reduce airway risks and prevent patient-threatening events.Over a 6-year period of time, all anesthesia records with a documented direct laryngoscopic view were retrieved from the electronic data management system and statistically processed. The Cormack-Lehane four-point scale of grading laryngoscopy was used to assess visibility of the vocal cords.Of 102,306 cases, the overall rate of difficult laryngoscopy was 4.9 %. Male gender (6.5 %), Mallampati score III and IV (17.3 %), obesity with a BMI ≥35 kg/m(2) (6.1 %), as well as physical status ASA III or IV (6.2 %), were identified as risk factors for difficult laryngoscopy. Patients undergoing surgery in the departments of oromaxillofacial (8.9 %), ear nose throat surgery (ENT) (7.4 %), and cardiac surgery (7.0 %) showed the highest rates of difficult laryngoscopy.The results indicate that the risk for difficult airway situations might substantially differ between surgical patient groups. In hospitals with departmental structures and spatially separated operating rooms, the deduction might be increased awareness and particular structural preparation for difficult airway situations in the respective subspecialties.The modified Cormack-Lehane score for the grading of direct laryngoscopy: evaluation in the Asian population.The use of a modified Cormack-Lehane scoring system (MCLS) of laryngoscopic views, as previously introduced in the Western population, was investigated during direct laryngoscopy in the Asian population. We studied the distribution of the different grades of MCLS, the predictive factors and rate of difficult laryngoscopy, and the association with difficult intubation. Six hundred and five patients requiring tracheal intubation during general anaesthesia were prospectively studied. The optimal views during direct laryngoscopy were scored using the 5-grade MCLS system. The distribution of the laryngoscopy scores was 73.9% Grade 1 (full view of the vocal cords), 21.0% Grade 2A (partial view of the vocal cords), 3.3% Grade 2B (only the arytenoids and epiglottis seen), 1.6% Grade 3 (only epiglottis visible) and 0.2% Grade 4 (neither the epiglottis nor glottis seen). External laryngeal pressure was necessary in 45.3% of cases to optimize laryngoscopic views. Grade 2B was associated with significantly higher incidence of difficult intubation compared with Grade 2A (65% vs 13.4%). The rates of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation were 5.1% and 6.9% respectively. The Mallampati classification and thyromental distance were associated with low predictive value for difficult laryngoscopy. The MCLS better delineates the difficulty experienced during laryngoscopy than the original Cormack-Lehane gradingEvaluation of the upper lip bite test in predicting difficult laryngoscopy.To evaluate the accuracy of the upper lip bite test (ULBT) in predicting difficult laryngoscopy.Prospective, observational outcome study.Operating room of a large tertiary-care academic medical center.6,882 consecutive adult, ASA physical status I, II, III, IV, and V patients, scheduled for procedures in all surgical specialties.Upper lip bite test class was determined for all patients preoperatively.The Cormack & Lehane grade of laryngeal view was determined at endotracheal intubation.Only 171 patients had ULBT class III, predicting a difficult laryngoscopy, while 173 patients presented with a Cormack & Lehane grade of 3 or 4. Of the 173, 14 patients had a previous ULBT class of III. Sensitivity and positive predictive value of the ULBT were 8.1% and 8.2%, respectively.The ULBT is a poor predictor of difficult laryngoscopy when used as the single bedside screening test in a North American patient population. Its use cannot be recommended.Ultrasound quantification of anterior soft tissue thickness fails to predict difficult laryngoscopy in obese patients.Morbid obesity is associated with difficult laryngoscopy and intubation. In the general population, bedside indices for predicting difficult intubation (i.e. Mallampati classification, thyromental distance, sternomental distance, mouth-opening and Wilson risk score) have poor-to-moderate sensitivity (20-62%) and moderate-to-fair specificity (82-97%). In the obese population, although the risk of difficult intubation after a positive Mallampati test is 34%, it is still not sufficient to be used as a single predictive test. An abundance of pretracheal soft tissue anterior to the vocal cords, as quantified by ultrasound, was a better predictor of difficult laryngoscopy than body mass index (BMI) in Israeli patients. Obesity is a growing problem in the United States: therefore we sought to confirm this finding in the obese population in the United States. We used ultrasound to quantify the neck soft tissue, from the skin to the anterior aspect of the trachea at the vocal cords, in 64 obese patients (BMI > 35). We assessed thyromental distance, mouth-opening, jaw movement, limited neck mobility, modified Mallampati score, abnormal upper teeth, neck circumference, confirmed obstructive sleep apnoea, BMI, age, race and gender as predictors. Twenty patients were classified as difficult laryngoscopy; they were older (47 +/- 9 vs 42 +/- 1 years; P = 0.048; mean +/- SD) and had less soft pretracheal tissue (20.4 +/- 3.0 vs 22.3 +/- 3.8 mm; P = 0.049) than did easy laryngoscopy patients. Multivariate regression indicated that none of the factors was an independent predictor of difficult laryngoscopy. We conclude that the thickness of pretracheal soft tissue at the level of the vocal cords is not a good predictor of difficult laryngoscopy in obese patients in the United States.A comparison of the Mallampati test in supine and upright positions with and without phonation in predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation: A prospective study.Difficult ventilation and intubation have been recognized as the forerunners of hypoxic brain damage during anesthesia. To overcome catastrophic events during anesthesia, an assessment of the airway before induction is of paramount importance. We designed this study to compare the effect of phonation on the Mallampati test in supine and upright positions as against the traditionally employed test without phonation in serving to predict difficult laryngoscopy and intubation.In this cross-sectional study, 661 patients aged 16-60 years were recruited during the years 2011 to 2012. The Mallampati test was conducted on patients with and without phonation in both the sitting and supine positions. A blinded observer then performed laryngoscopy and intubation. Difficult intubation was assessed according to the Cormack-Lehane Grading scale.Diagnostic statistical measures for each of the four situations - sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy - were calculated.In this study, 28 patients (4.2%) had difficult laryngoscopy and nine patients (1.4%) had difficult intubation. There was no difference in the sensitivity of the Mallampati test as regards prediction of laryngoscopy and intubation in the four different positions, but the upright position along with phonation had the highest specificity. The negative predictive value was above 95% in all the positions; however, the positive predictive value was the highest in the supine position along with phonation.Based on our results, the supine position along with phonation had the best correlation in the prediction of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation. We further conclude that phonation significantly improved the Mallampati class in the supine position compared with the upright position.Phonation affects Mallampati class.Difficult endotracheal intubation in patients with sleep apnea syndrome.Although sleep apnea syndrome (SAS) is common, studies assessing the anesthetic management of these patients are rare and consist mainly of case studies. We performed a retrospective case-control study to determine the incidence of difficult intubation in SAS patients and to determine the relationship between the severity of SAS and the occurrence of difficult intubation. Among 113 patients included (36 and 77 in the SAS and control groups, respectively), difficult intubation occurred more often in SAS patients than in controls (21.9% versus 2.6%, respectively; P < 0.05). No relationship was found between the severity of SAS and the occurrence of difficult intubation. Disappointingly, no single factor was associated with the occurrence of difficult intubation in SAS patients. We conclude that SAS is a risk factor for difficult intubation.Because patients with sleep apnea syndrome have an increased risk of difficult endotracheal intubation and may present with cardiovascular disease, preoperative preventive measures should be undertaken to avoid untoward events.Comparison of the upper lip bite test with measurement of thyromental distance for prediction of difficult intubations.The upper lip bite test (ULBT) introduced in 2003 is a simple method for predicting difficult intubations. According to this test, the higher a patient can bite the upper lip with the lower incisors, the lower the risk of difficult intubation. Given the necessity for evaluation and re-evaluation of a newer predictive method, this study was conducted to compare the ULBT with another method for difficult airway prediction, the measurement of thyromental distance (TMD).In this prospective, observational, single-blind study, 350 patients who required inhaled general anesthesia with endotracheal intubation for elective surgery were enrolled for evaluation of the accuracy in predicting difficult intubation by TMD measurement and ULBT. In the ULBT, the capacity of biting the upper lip is categorized into three classes: class I, a patient is able to raise the lower incisors above the vermilion line; class II, a patient is able to bite the upper lip below the vermilion line; and class III, a patient is unable to bite the upper lip. After induction of anesthesia with a standard protocol, the patient's grade of laryngeal view by the Cormack-Lehane classification was documented by an anesthesiologist with at least 3 years' experience who was unaware of prior evaluations. A TMD equal to or less than 4 cm and a class III ULBT were considered to be predictive of difficult intubation. A Cormack-Lehane class III or IV was considered a difficult intubation.Only 20 (5.7%) of the patients were considered to have difficult intubations. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy were 70%, 93.3%, 39%, 98.1%, and 92.6%, respectively, for the ULBT, and 55%, 88%, 22%, 97%, and 86.3%, respectively, for TMD. Specificity and positive predictive value were found to be significantly higher for the ULBT than for TMD (p < 0.05). The sensitivity, negative predictive value, and accuracy were not significantly different between the two methods.The findings suggest that the sensitivity of the ULBT and TMD for predicting difficult intubations may not be significantly different, but the specificity of the ULBT is significantly higher. The positive predictive value of the ULBT was significantly higher than that of TMD, signifying that a positive ULBT is more predictive of a difficult airway than is a positive TMD.A combination of the modified Mallampati score, thyromental distance, anatomical abnormality, and cervical mobility (M-TAC) predicts difficult laryngoscopy better than Mallampati classification.Unanticipated difficult tracheal intubation is a significant source of morbidity and mortality in anesthetized patients. A number of modules have been developed to predict difficult airways, but they are often complex in nature. We combined the modified Mallampati score (M), thyromental distance (T), anatomical abnormality (A), and cervical mobility (C) into a single scoring system with the acronym M-TAC, and evaluated it against Mallampati scoring.We prospectively analyzed 500 adult patients of the American Society of Anesthesiologists (ASA) class I or II, scheduled for elective surgery under general anesthesia. Preoperative airway assessments using M-TAC were performed, all of which were given a score. Anesthesiologists, blinded to the pre-anesthetic airway assessment, performed laryngoscopy and graded the laryngoscopic view as per Cormack and Lehane's classification. For the study purpose, difficult laryngoscopy was defined as Cormack and Lehane Grade 3 or 4 of laryngoscopic view.An M-TAC score ≥ 4 had a significantly higher sensitivity (96% vs. 72%) and specificity (86% vs. 78%) with a high positive predictive value (44% vs. 28%) and a very low false negative value (2% vs. 15%) in comparison with Mallampati scoring (p < 0.05). Analysis of the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve for predicting difficult laryngoscopy revealed an area under the curve of 0.83 (95% CI = 0.78-0.88) for Mallampati scoring and 0.94 (95% CI = 0.92-0.96) for M-TAC scoring system.The M-TAC scoring system has provided a higher sensitivity and specificity in predicting difficult laryngoscopy in comparison with Mallampati classification.Risk factors assessment of the difficult airway: an italian survey of 1956 patients.Over the last decade, there has been a heightened awareness and an increase in the amount of literature being published on recognition and prediction of the difficult airway. During the preoperative evaluation of the airway, a thorough history and physical specifically related to the airway should be performed. Various measurements of anatomic features and noninvasive clinical tests can be performed to enhance this assessment. In this study we correlated the Mallampati modified score and several other indexes with the laryngoscopic view to identify anatomical and clinical risk factors related to the difficult airway. We prospectively collected data on 1956 consecutive patients scheduled to receive general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation for elective surgery. The Mallampati classification versus the Cormack-Lehane (C-L) linear correlation index was 0.904. A Mallampati Class 3 correlated with a C-L Grade 2 (0.94), whereas a Mallampati Class 4 correlated with a C-L Grade 3 (0.85) and a C-L Grade 4 (0.80). Operator evaluation, performed by a simplified tracheal intubation difficulty scale, showed a linear correlation of 0.96 compared with the C-L groups. Although there is a correlation between oropharyngeal volume and difficult intubation, the Mallampati score by itself is insufficient for predicting difficult endotracheal intubation.Diagnostic value of different screening tests in isolation or combination for predicting difficult intubation: A prospective study.Predicting difficult laryngoscopy in acromegaly: a comparison of upper lip bite test with modified Mallampati classification.Upper lip bite test (ULBT) is a simple test for predicting difficult intubation. However, it has not been evaluated in acromegalic patients. The primary aim of this study was to compare ULBT with modified Mallampati classification (MMPC) to predict difficult laryngoscopy in acromegalic patients. Over a 5-year period, 64 acromegalic and 63 nonacromegalic patients presenting for excision of pituitary tumor were enrolled. Preoperative airway assessment was done using MMPC and the ULBT. Under anesthesia, laryngoscopic view was assessed using Cormack-Lehane (CL) grading. MMPC III/IV and ULBT grade III were considered predictive of difficult laryngoscopy that was defined as Cormack-Lehane grades III or IV. Difficult intubation was defined as more than 2 direct laryngoscopy attempts involving change of blade or use of bougie/fiberoptic bronchoscope/intubating laryngeal mask airway. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of both tests in predicting difficult laryngoscopy were calculated. Incidence of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation in acromegalics were 24% and 11%, respectively. MMPC and ULBT predicted difficulty in 61% and 14% acromegalics, respectively. However, only 26% and 44% of the laryngoscopies predicted to be difficult by MMMC and ULBT, respectively, were actually difficult. MMPC failed to predict 33% of difficult laryngoscopies whereas ULBT failed to predict 73%. Neither test predicted difficulty in 33% laryngoscopies that turned out to be difficult. Twenty-seven percent of the difficult laryngoscopies were correctly predicted by both tests. In acromegalic group, MMPC was more sensitive, whereas ULBT was more specific. Sensitivity and accuracy of both tests were less in acromegalic patients compared with nonacromegalic controls.Short thyromental distance: a predictor of difficult intubation or an indicator for small blade selection?Short thyromental distance (TMD; < 5 cm) has been correlated with difficult direct laryngoscopic intubation in adult patients. The authors hypothesized that a smaller Macintosh curved blade (No. 2 MCB) would improve the predicted difficult laryngoscopy in short-TMD patients over that with a standard Macintosh curved blade (No. 3 MCB).In a preliminary study of 11 consenting adults (7 females and 4 males), American Society of Anesthesiologists physical status I and TMD < or = 5 cm, lateral neck radiographs were recorded during laryngoscopy with a No. 2 and No. 3 MCB in sequential fashion. In a prospective clinical study, laryngoscopy and tracheal intubation were evaluated in 83 adult patients with TMD < or = 5 cm by randomly assigning them to two groups for the blade used at first intubation. Those who failed intubation with the first blade were switched to the alternate blade. In total 100 laryngoscopies and intubations were performed: the No. 2 MCB (n = 50) and the No. 3 MCB (n = 50).Lateral neck radiographs recorded at the best laryngeal view revealed that the tip of the No. 2 MCB was proximal to the hyoid body with the No. 2 MCB and distal to it with the No. 3 MCB. The intubation distance (C5 to blade tip) on neck radiographs with the No. 2 MCB was significantly greater than it was with the No. 3 MCB for similar anterior jaw displacement. In the clinical study, the laryngoscopic grade with the No. 2 blade was considered easy (median, 2B), better than the grade with the No. 3 MCB (median, 3). When the No. 2 MCB was used, external laryngeal pressure improved the laryngoscopic grade (1, full glottic view) in 46% of patients. In contrast, when the No. 3 MCB was used, pressure improved the grade in only 10% of the patients. Intubation time with the No. 2 MCB was significantly (P < 0.05) less than it was in patients with No. 3 MCB. Overall, 14 patients who failed intubation with the No. 3 MCB were switched to the No. 2 MCB, and intubation was successful with an easy laryngoscopic grade. Three patients who failed intubation with the No. 2 MCB were switched to the No. 3 MCB.The predicted difficult laryngoscopy and intubation with the use of the adult No. 3 MCB in standard adult patients with a TMD < or = 5 cm is significantly easier with use of the smaller No. 2 MCB.Increased body mass index per se is not a predictor of difficult laryngoscopy.We investigated the association between morbid obesity and difficult laryngoscopy (DL).In a prospective, controlled study we evaluated the impact of different variables on the prediction of DL in 200 morbidly obese (study group-SG), and 1272 non-obese (control group-CG) patients undergoing elective surgery. Variables assessed included age, sex, body mass index (BMI), protruding, loose, and missing upper teeth, thyro-mental distance, temporo-mandibular joint (TMJ) function, neck extension, and Mallampati class. A Cormack grade III or IV was considered DL.The SG patients were younger (P < 0.000), there were more females in the SG (P < 0.000) and more in the SG had teeth problems (P = 0.026). More patients in the SG (10% vs 1%), had obstructive sleep apnea (P < 0.001) with 90% of them in the SG having a grade III laryngoscopy. High BMI did not affect the laryngoscopy difficulty (P = 0.56). Multivariable regression analysis revealed that morbid obesity, increased age, male sex, pathology of TMJ, and higher Mallampati class, were independent predictors of DL. When interaction between the predictors and the group was added to the multivariable model, the SG was no longer a predictor by itself, rather its association with abnormal upper teeth turned to be significant for prediction of DL.Increased age, male sex, TMJ pathology, Mallampati 3 and 4, a history of obstructive sleep apnea and abnormal upper teeth were associated with a higher incidence of DL. The magnitude of BMI had no influence on difficulty with laryngoscopy.The palm print as predictor of difficult intubation.Prediction of difficult tracheal intubation.Three hundred and fifty consecutive patients (322 non-obstetric, 28 obstetric; 185 female) were assessed before operation using the modified Mallampati test and by measuring thyromental and sternomental distances, forward protrusion of the mandible and interincisor gap with the mouth fully open. Tracheal intubation was difficult in 17 (4.9%) patients, of whom four (1.14%) had a grade III or IV view on laryngoscopy. A sternomental distance of 12.5 cm or less with the head fully extended on the neck and the mouth closed predicted 14 of the 17 patients in whom tracheal intubation was difficult. As a screening test, sternomental distance appeared to be more sensitive (82.4%) and more specific (88.6%) than thyromental distance (64.7% and 81.4%, respectively), the modified Mallampati test (64.7% and 66.1%, respectively) and forward protrusion of the mandible (29.4% and 85.0%, respectively). The interincisor gap ranged from 2.0 to 5.0 cm in all patients except one. There was no correlation between the interincisor gap and the view on laryngoscopy (P > 0.05, one-way ANOVA). There was also no difference in mean interincisor gap between those patients who presented no difficulty with tracheal intubation and those who did (P = 0.7-0.8, two sample t test). Sternomental distance may be a useful bedside screening test for preoperative prediction of difficult tracheal intubation.Lateral neck radiography for prediction of difficult orotracheal intubation.Failed endotracheal intubation is a principal cause of morbidity and mortality in anesthetized patients. The aim of this study was to investigate the efficiency of lateral neck radiography in predicting difficult intubation.In a prospective triple-blind study, 100 patients (aged 18-89 yr), scheduled for elective surgery were randomly selected. Lateral neck X-ray was obtained from each of the patients before operation. Several angles and parameters on the X-ray were proposed to illustrate a relationship with easy or difficult intubation. A radiologist recorded these angles before the operation. An anaesthesiologist also determined the Mallampati score preoperation. At the time of intubation, two other anesthesiologists performed a laryngoscopy and, according to established criteria, identified the patients as easy or difficult intubation. The results were then compared with each other.Fifteen patients were identified as having difficult intubation (laryngoscopy Grades III and IV). Sensitivity and specificity of the Mallampati Class test were 26% and 100%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of the lateral neck X-ray for three measured angles were 100%. The positive and negative predictive values (NPVs) for those angles were 100% and for Mallampati classification were 100% and 80%, respectively.Compared to the Mallampati Class test, our method of analyzing the lateral X-ray, although not as easy and universally applicable as Mallampati Class test, proved to be a suitable method for predicting difficult intubation.Comparison of upper lip bite test with Mallampati test in the prediction of difficult intubation at a tertiary care hospital of Pakistan.To determine the accuracy of the Upper lip bite test and Mallampati test in predicting difficult endotracheal intubation.The cross-sectional study was conducted at the Aga Khan University Hospital, a tertiary care facility in Karachi, Pakistan. Between June 1,2007 and May 31, 2008, 324 adult patients undergoing elective surgeries requiring general anaesthesia with endotracheal intubations were enrolled. Pre-operatively upper lip bite test and Mallampati test were performed for the assessment of airway by a specifically trained observer. Laryngoscopic view was rated by using Cormack and Lehane laryngoscopic grading once the patient was fully anaesthetised using standard anaesthesia technique. Completed data sheets were analysed using SPSS version 10. McNemar test and rank correlation coefficient were used to compare the upper lip bite test and the Mallampati test.Of the 324 patients, 56 (17.3%) were classified as cases of difficult intubation. Upper lip bite test showed significantly higher accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value than the Mallampati test. Comparison of specificity, however, did not reveal any significant difference between the two tests.Upper lip bite test is an acceptable alternative as a single test to predict difficult intubation in addition to other tests of airway assessment for the prediction of difficult intubation.The diagnostic value of the upper lip bite test combined with sternomental distance, thyromental distance, and interincisor distance for prediction of easy laryngoscopy and intubation: a prospective study.Accuracy of upper lip bite test (ULBT) has been compared with the Mallampati classification. In this study, we investigated whether the combination of the ULBT classification with sternomental distance (SMD), thyromental distance (TMD), and interincisor distance (IID) or a composite score can improve the ability to predict easy laryngoscopy and intubation compared with each test alone.In a prospective study, 380 patients who were scheduled for elective surgery were selected randomly and enrolled in the study. Before inducing anesthesia, the airways were assessed, and ULBT class, SMD, TMD, and IID determined. Laryngoscopic view according to the Cormack and Lehane grading system was determined after induction of anesthesia and Grades 3 and 4 defined as "difficult intubation." By using receiver operating characteristic analysis, the best cutoff points of the tests were calculated. Finally, sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy of these tests and their combinations with the ULBT were calculated.The prevalence of difficult intubation was 5% (n = 19). Class III ULBT, IID <4.5 cm, TMD <6.5 cm, and SMD <13 cm were defined as predictors of difficult intubation. There was no significant difference regarding difficult intubation based on gender (P < 0.05), whereas there were significant differences between the older tests and laryngeal view (P < 0.05, Mc-Nemar test). Specificity and accuracy of the ULBT were significantly higher than TMD, SMD, and IID individually (specificity was 91.69%, 82.27%, 70.64%, and 82.27%, respectively, and accuracy was 91.05%, 71.32%, 81.84%, and 76.58%, respectively). The combination of the ULBT with SMD provided the highest sensitivity.We conclude that the specificity and accuracy of the ULBT is significantly higher than the other tests and is more accurate in airway assessment. However, the ULBT in conjunction with the other tests could more reliably predict easy laryngoscopy or intubation.Morbid obesity and tracheal intubation.The tracheas of obese patients may be more difficult to intubate than those of normal-weight patients. We studied 100 morbidly obese patients (body mass index >40 kg/m(2)) to identify which factors complicate direct laryngoscopy and tracheal intubation. Preoperative measurements (height, weight, neck circumference, width of mouth opening, sternomental distance, and thyromental distance) and Mallampati score were recorded. The view during direct laryngoscopy was graded, and the number of attempts at tracheal intubation was recorded. Neither absolute obesity nor body mass index was associated with intubation difficulties. Large neck circumference and high Mallampati score were the only predictors of potential intubation problems. Because in all but one patient the trachea was intubated successfully by direct laryngoscopy, the neck circumference that requires an intervention such as fiberoptic bronchoscopy to establish an airway remains unknown. We conclude that obesity alone is not predictive of tracheal intubation difficulties.In 100 morbidly obese patients, neither obesity nor body mass index predicted problems with tracheal intubation. However, a high Mallampati score (greater-than-or-equal to 3) and large neck circumference may increase the potential for difficult laryngoscopy and intubation.[Comparative value of clinical signs of difficult tracheal intubation in women].A prospective study was designed to compare the value of clinical signs aimed to predict difficult intubation in women. A group of 663 women, scheduled for elective surgery, were assessed by an anaesthetist at the preanaesthetic visit. Following parameters were assessed: the degree of mouth opening, the chin-hyoid bone and the chin-thyroid cartilage distances, dental and facial abnormalities, age, weight. All patients were ranked on the Mallampati scale. Another anaesthetist carried out the anaesthetic induction and endotracheal intubation. The latter was deemed to have been difficult if special procedures had been required (use of a stylet, a fibroscope, or Sellick's manoeuvre). In accordance with these criteria 12.5% of women were difficult to intubate. Furthermore, he assessed the degree of glottic exposure, using a Macintosh blade and according to Cormack's classification. Six per cent of women were ranked C or D in Cormack's classification (C: the glottic aperture was not seen; D: the epiglottis was not seen). Finally 66% of women with difficult intubation and 84% of those with severely abnormal glottic exposure were ranked greater than 1 on the Mallampati scale. This scale had high sensitivity (0.84), but a specificity of only 0.66. Other clinical criteria (mouth opening, the chin-hyoid bone distance) had a lower sensitivities, but seemed more specific. Multivariate analysis showed that specificity could be improved (0.84) if the distance between the upper and lower incisor teeth (mouth opening) was associated with Mallampati's rank, without any loss in sensitivity. A simple chart is proposed to assess the risk of difficult intubation.Comparison of acromioaxillosuprasternal notch index (a new test) with modified Mallampati test in predicting difficult visualization of larynx.We aimed to compare the efficacy of a new bedside screening test named acromioaxillosuprasternal notch index (AASI) with modified Mallampati (MMP).A total of 603 adult patients, who were candidates for tracheal intubation in elective surgery, were enrolled in this prospective study. Preoperative airway assessment was carried out with AASI and MMP. The new AASI score is calculated based on the following measurements: (1) using a ruler, a vertical line is drawn from the top of the acromion process to the superior border of the axilla at the pectoralis major muscle (line A); (2) a second line is drawn perpendicular to line A from the suprasternal notch (line B); and (3) the portion of line A that lies above the point where line B intersects it is line C. AASI is calculated by dividing the length of line C by that of line A (AASI = C/A). After induction of anesthesia, the laryngeal view was recorded according to the Cormack-Lehane grading system. Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis was employed to compare between AASI and MMP.Difficult visualization of larynx (DVL, Cormack-Lehane III and IV) was observed in 38 (6.3%) patients. The best cutoff point for DVL was defined at AASI > 0.49. AASI had a lower false negative rate and higher predictive values (sensitivity, positive predictive value, and accuracy) in comparison with MMP.AASI was associated with higher predictive values than MMP and could be used for estimation of DVL.Failure to predict difficult tracheal intubation for emergency caesarean section.Difficult tracheal intubation following induction of general anaesthesia for caesarean section is a cause of morbidity and mortality. Our aim was to evaluate five bedside predictors that might identify women with potential intubation difficulty immediately prior to emergency caesarean section.Women requiring emergency caesarean section with general anaesthesia and tracheal intubation who had been assessed by the same experienced anaesthesiologist preoperatively were included in this study. Mallampati score, sternomental distance, thyromental distance, interincisor gap and atlantooccipital extension were all measured. The same anaesthesiologist performed laryngoscopy and graded the laryngeal view according to Cormack and Lehane. Exact logistic regression was used to identify significant independent predictors for difficult intubation (Cormack and Lehane grades ≥ 3) with two-sided P value less than 0.05 considered as significant.In 3 years, 239 women were recruited. Cormack and Lehane grades of 2 or less (easy) were found in 225 and grade of at least 3 (difficult) in 14 women. Patients' characteristics (age, height, weight, BMI or weight gain) were not significantly associated with difficulty of intubation. The incidence of difficult intubation was 1/17 women [95% confidence interval (CI) from 1/31 to 1/10]. A positive result from any of the five predictors combined had a sensitivity of 0.21 (95%CI 0.05-0.51), a specificity of 0.92 (95%CI 0.88-0.96), a positive predictive value of 0.15 (95%CI 0.032-0.38) and a negative predictive value of 0.95 (95%CI 0.91-0.97) for a Cormack and Lehane grade of at least 3 at laryngoscopy.Airway assessment using these tests cannot be relied upon to predict a difficult intubation at emergency caesarean section as the low sensitivity means that 79% (95%CI 49-95) of difficult intubations will be missed.The predictive value of the ratio of neck circumference to thyromental distance in comparison with four predictive tests for difficult laryngoscopy in obstetric patients scheduled for caesarean delivery.Preoperative assessment of anatomical landmarks andclinical factors help detect potentially difficult laryngoscopies. The aim of the present study was to compare the ability to predict difficult visualization of the larynx from thefollowing preoperative airway predictive indices, in isolation and combination: Neck circumference to thyromental distance (NC/TMD), neck circumference (NC), modified Mallampatitest (MMT), the ratio of height to thyromental distance (RHTMD), and the upper-lip-bite test (ULBT).We collected data on657 consecutive patients scheduled for elective caesarean delivery under general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation and then evaluated all five factors before caesarean. An experienced anesthesiologist, not informed of the recorded preoperative airway evaluation, performed the laryngoscopy and grading (as per Cormack and Lehane's classification). Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for each airway predictor in isolation and in combination were determined.Difficult laryngoscopy (Grade 3 or 4) occurred in 53 (8.06%) patients. There were significant differences in thyromental distance (TMD), RHTMD, NC, and NC/TMD between difficult visualization of larynx and easy visualization of larynx patients (P < 0.05). The main end-point area under curve (AUC) of the receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) was lower for MMT (AUC = 0.497; 95% Confidence Interval = CI,0.045-0.536) and ULBT (AUC = 0.500, 95% CI, 0.461-0.539) compared to RHTMD, NC, TMD, and NC/TMD score ([AUC = 0.627, 95% CI, 0.589-0.664], [AUC = 0.691; 95% CI, 0.654-0.726], [AUC = 0.606; 95% CI, 0.567-0.643], [AUC = 0.689;95% CI, 0.625-0.724], respectively), and the differences of six ROC curves were statistically significant (P < 0.05).The NC/TM Discomparable with NC, RHTMD, and ULBT for the prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in caes are an delivery.Difficult laryngoscopy and intubation in the Indian population: An assessment of anatomical and clinical risk factors.Differences in patient characteristics due to race or ethnicity may influence the incidence of difficult airway. Our purpose was to determine the incidence of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation, as well as the anatomical features and clinical risk factors that influence them, in the Indian population.In 330 adult patients receiving general anaesthesia with tracheal intubation, airway characteristics and clinical factors were determined and their association with difficult laryngoscopy (Cormack and Lehane grade 3 and 4) was analysed. Intubation Difficulty Scale score was used to identify degree of difficult laryngoscopy.The incidence of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation was 9.7% and 4.5%, respectively. Univariate analysis showed that increasing age and weight, male gender, modified Mallampati class (MMC) 3 and 4 in sitting and supine positions, inter-incisor distance (IID) ≤3.5 cm, thyromental (TMD) and sternomental distance, ratio of height and TMD, short neck, limited mandibular protrusion, decreased range of neck movement, history of snoring, receding mandible and cervical spondylosis were associated with difficult laryngoscopy. Multivariate analysis identified four variables that were independently associated with difficult laryngoscopy: MMC class 3 and 4, range of neck movement <80°, IID ≤ 3.5 cm and snoring.We found an incidence of 9.7% and 4.5% for difficult laryngoscopy and difficult intubation, respectively, in Indian patients with apparently normal airways. MMC class 3 and 4, range of neck movement <80°, IID ≤ 3.5 cm and snoring were independently related to difficult laryngoscopy. There was a high incidence (48.5%) of minor difficulty in intubation.Determination of difficult intubation in the ED.The aim of this study is to determine the predictors of difficult intubation in the emergency setting.This prospective observational clinical study was conducted in the emergency department (ED) of a University Hospital with an annually census of 50 000 visits from May 2005 to May 2007. All patients requiring intubation in the ED were included into the study. During the study period, same airway management protocol was used all intubations. The study form included patient's demographic and variables according to intubation such as the Cormack-Lehane grade, modified LEMON score, Glasgow Coma Scale score, success rate, and associated complications.A total of 366 patients were included in the study. The mean age of the study patients was 46.8 +/- 22.8, and 68.6% (n = 251) of them were male. A total of 86 (23.5%) patients were classified in the difficult intubation group and 280 (76.5%) patients in easy intubation group. Logistic regression analysis performed by the variables found to be significant in the univariate analysis revealed thyroid-to-hyoid distance less than 2 fingers (odds ratio, 3.34; 95% confidence interval, 1.35-8.27; P = .009) as an independent factor complicating the intubation. Cormack and Lehane classification was strongly related to difficult intubation. Intubation was more difficult from grade 1 to 4 (11% vs 25.2% vs 34% vs 81.8%, respectively; P = .000).The thyroid-to-hyoid distance less than 2 fingers is the only independent variable in predicting difficult intubation. Mallampati classification is not a useful tool in classifying the difficult intubation in the ED that the "LEMON" acrostic can be modified to "LEON".Predicting difficult intubation with indirect laryngoscopy.It is not always possible to predict when tracheal intubation will be difficult or impossible. The authors wanted to determine whether indirect laryngoscopy could identify patients in whom intubation was difficult.Indirect laryngoscopy was done in 2,504 patients. The Wilson risk sum score and the modified Mallampati score were also studied in a different series of 3,680 patients for comparison. These predictive methods were compared according to three parameters: positive predictive value, sensitivity, and specificity.Of 6,184 patients studied, the trachea proved difficult to intubate in 82 (1.3%). Positive predictive value (31%) and specificity (98.4%) with indirect laryngoscopy were greater than the other two predictive methods (P < 0.01), whereas sensitivity with indirect laryngoscopy (69.2%) was greater than that of the Wilson risk sum score (55.4%) (P < 0.01).Although in 15% of patients indirect laryngoscopy could not be performed because of excessive gag reflex, indirect laryngoscopy can serve as an effective method to predict difficult intubation.Can an airway assessment score predict difficulty at intubation in the emergency department?To assess whether an airway assessment score based on the LEMON method is able to predict difficulty at intubation in the emergency department.Patients requiring endotracheal intubation in the resuscitation room of a UK teaching hospital between June 2002 and September 2003 were assessed on criteria based on the LEMON method. At laryngoscopy, the Cormack and Lehane grade was recorded. An airway assessment score was devised and assessed.156 patients were intubated during the study period. There were 114 Cormack and Lehane grade 1 intubations, 29 grade 2 intubations, 11 grade 3 intubations, and 2 grade 4 intubations. Patients with large incisors (p<0.001), a reduced inter-incisor distance (p<0.05), or a reduced thyroid to floor of mouth distance (p<0.05) were all more likely to have a poor laryngoscopic view (grade 2, 3, or 4). Patients with a high airway assessment score were more likely to have a poor laryngoscopic view compared with those patients with a low airway assessment score (p<0.05).An airway assessment score based on criteria of the LEMON method is able to successfully stratify the risk of intubation difficulty in the emergency department. Patients with a poor laryngoscopic view (grades 2, 3, or 4) were more likely to have large incisors, a reduced inter-incisor distance, and a reduced thyroid to floor of mouth distance. They were also more likely to have a higher airway assessment score than those patients with a good laryngoscopic view.The incidence and risk factors of difficult mask ventilation.The ability to ventilate and oxygenate a patient using a bag-mask breathing system may be lifesaving in the case of failure of the initial intubation attempt. In this study, we aimed to determine the incidence of difficult mask ventilation (DMV) and to find preoperative risk factors for this procedure.Based on methods used for overcoming some difficulties with bag-mask ventilation (MV), classification has been made into four categories: easy MV, awkward MV, difficult MV, and impossible MV. A univariate analysis was performed to identify potential risk factors predicting DMV, followed by a stepwise forward binary logistic regression, and the odds ratio and 95% confidence interval were calculated.A total of 576 patients were studied. Incidence of easy MV, awkward MV, and difficult MV were found to be 75.5% (n = 435), 16.7% (n = 96), and 7.8% (n = 45), respectively. Height, weight, age, male gender, increased Mallampati class, history of snoring, lack of teeth, and beard were found to be DMV risk factors (P < 0.05). Using a multivariate analysis, Mallampati class 4, male, history of snoring, age, and weight were found to be significantly associated with DMV. Although the incidence of DMV in general was 7.8% (n = 45), the incidence of DMV among patients with difficult intubation (n = 123) was found to be 15.5% (n = 19).Mallampati class 4, male patients, history of snoring, increasing age, and increasing weight were found to be risk factors for DMV in our study.Prediction and outcomes of impossible mask ventilation: a review of 50,000 anesthetics.There are no existing data regarding risk factors for impossible mask ventilation and limited data regarding its incidence. The authors sought to determine the incidence, predictors, and outcomes associated with impossible mask ventilation.The authors performed an observational study over a 4-yr period. For each adult patient undergoing a general anesthetic, preoperative patient characteristics, detailed airway physical exam, and airway outcome data were collected. The primary outcome was impossible mask ventilation defined as the inability to exchange air during bag-mask ventilation attempts, despite multiple providers, airway adjuvants, or neuromuscular blockade. Secondary outcomes included the final, definitive airway management technique and direct laryngoscopy view. The incidence of impossible mask ventilation was calculated. Independent (P < 0.05) predictors of impossible mask ventilation were identified by performing a logistic regression full model fit.Over a 4-yr period from 2004 to 2008, 53,041 attempts at mask ventilation were recorded. A total of 77 cases of impossible mask ventilation (0.15%) were observed. Neck radiation changes, male sex, sleep apnea, Mallampati III or IV, and presence of beard were identified as independent predictors. The receiver-operating-characteristic area under the curve for this model was 0.80 +/- 0.03. Nineteen impossible mask ventilation patients (25%) also demonstrated difficult intubation, with 15 being intubated successfully. Twelve patients required an alternative intubation technique, including two surgical airways and two patients who were awakened and underwent successful fiberoptic intubation.Impossible mask ventilation is an infrequent airway event that is associated with difficult intubation. Neck radiation changes represent the most significant clinical predictor of impossible mask ventilation in the patient dataset.Predictive performance of three multivariate difficult tracheal intubation models: a double-blind, case-controlled study.We performed a case-controlled, double-blind study to examine the performance of three multivariate clinical models (Wilson, Arné, and Naguib models) in the prediction of unanticipated difficult intubation. The study group consisted of 97 patients in whom an unanticipated difficult intubation had occurred. For each difficult intubation patient, a matched control patient was selected in whom tracheal intubation had been easily accomplished. Postoperatively, a blinded investigator evaluated both patients. The clinical assessment included the patient's weight, height, age, Mallampati score, interincisor gap, thyromental distance, thyrosternal distance, neck circumference, Wilson risk sum score, history of previous difficult intubation, and diseases associated with difficult laryngoscopy or intubation. The Naguib model was significantly more sensitive (81.4%; P < 0.0001) than the Arné (54.6%) or Wilson (40.2%) models. Both the Naguib (76.8%) and Arné (74.7%) model classified more intubations correctly (P = 0.01) than the Wilson model (66.5%). The specificity of Arné, Wilson, and Naguib model was 94.9%, 92.8%, and 72.2%, respectively (P < 0.0001). The corresponding area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.87, 0.79, and 0.82, respectively. Our new model for prediction of difficult intubation was developed using logistic regression and includes thyromental distance, Mallampati score, interincisor gap, and height. This model is 82.5% sensitive and 85.6% specific with an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.90.Preoperative assessment for difficult intubation in general and ENT surgery: predictive value of a clinical multivariate risk index.Several clinical multifactorial indexes have been described for predicting difficult laryngoscopy or intubation, or both, mostly in general surgery, and less frequently in ENT surgery. The objective of this study was to develop and validate a single clinical index for prediction of difficulty in tracheal intubation in both ENT and general surgery. We studied a population of 1200 consecutive ENT and general surgical patients. Clinical criteria were tested using univariate and multivariate analysis. Difficult intubation was defined as requiring unusual techniques. Logistic regression identified seven criteria as independent predictors of difficult tracheal intubation; previous history of difficult intubation; pathologies associated with difficult intubation; clinical symptoms of pathological airway; inter-incisor gap and mandible luxation; thyromental distance; head and neck movement; and Mallampati's modified test. Point values were assigned to each of these factors in proportion to regression coefficients representing the relative weight of each predictive intubation difficulty factor, the sum comprising the score. The best predictive threshold was chosen using a receiver operating characteristic curve. We then prospectively studied and validated the score in a population of 1090 consecutive ENT and general surgery patients. The sensitivity and specificity of the predictions were 94% and 96% in general surgery, 90% and 93% in non-cancer ENT surgery, and 92% and 66% in ENT cancer surgery, respectively.Prediction of difficult laryngoscopy: an assessment of the thyromental distance and Mallampati predictive tests.Two hundred and fifty patients were assessed preoperatively using the Mallampati classification and by measuring their thyromental distances. The ease or difficulty of direct laryngoscopy was assessed at the time of induction of anaesthesia. Retrognathia was seen in 15.6% of patients and the incidence of difficult laryngoscopy without external laryngeal pressure was 8.2%. It was found that both assessments predicted less than two in three difficult laryngoscopies and had high false positive rates. It was found that external laryngeal pressure often improved the view of the glottis in difficult laryngoscopies.The predictive value of the height ratio and thyromental distance: four predictive tests for difficult laryngoscopy.Preoperative evaluation of anatomical landmarks and clinical factors help identify potentially difficult laryngoscopies; however, predictive reliability is unclear. Because the ratio of height to thyromental distance (RHTMD) has a demonstrably better predictive value than the thyromental distance (TMD), we evaluated the predictive value and odds ratios of RHTMD versus mouth opening, TMD, neck movement, and oropharyngeal view (modified Mallampati). We collected data on 550 consecutive patients scheduled for elective-surgery general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation and then assessed all five factors before surgery. An experienced anesthesiologist, not apprised of the recorded preoperative airway assessment, performed the laryngoscopy and grading (as per Cormack and Lehane's classification). Difficult laryngoscopy (Grade 3 or 4) occurred in 69 patients (12.5%). RHTMD had a higher sensitivity, positive predictive value, and fewer false negatives than the other variables tested. In the multivariate analysis, three criteria were found independent for difficult laryngoscopy (neck movement < or =80 degrees; Mallampati Class 3 or 4, and RHTMD > or =23.5). The odds ratio (95% confidence interval) of the RHTMD, Mallampati class, and neck movement were 6.72 (3.29-13.72), 2.96 (1.63-5.35), and 2.73 (1.14-6.51), respectively. The odds ratio for RHTMD was the largest and thus may prove a useful screening test for difficult laryngoscopy.Prediction of difficult mask ventilation.Maintenance of airway patency and oxygenation are the main objectives of face-mask ventilation. Because the incidence of difficult mask ventilation (DMV) and the factors associated with it are not well known, we undertook this prospective study.Difficult mask ventilation was defined as the inability of an unassisted anesthesiologist to maintain the measured oxygen saturation as measured by pulse oximetry > 92% or to prevent or reverse signs of inadequate ventilation during positive-pressure mask ventilation under general anesthesia. A univariate analysis was performed to identify potential factors predicting DMV, followed by a multivariate analysis, and odds ratio and 95% confidence interval were calculated.A total of 1,502 patients were prospectively included. DMV was reported in 75 patients (5%; 95% confidence interval, 3.9-6.1%), with one case of impossible ventilation. DMV was anticipated by the anesthesiologist in only 13 patients (17% of the DMV cases). Body mass index, age, macroglossia, beard, lack of teeth, history of snoring, increased Mallampati grade, and lower thyromental distance were identified in the univariate analysis as potential DMV risk factors. Using a multivariate analysis, five criteria were recognized as independent factors for a DMV (age older than 55 yr, body mass index > 26 kg/m2, beard, lack of teeth, history of snoring), the presence of two indicating high likelihood of DMV (sensitivity, 0.72; specificity, 0.73).In a general adult population, DMV was reported in 5% of the patients. A simple DMV risk score was established. Being able to more accurately predict DMV may improve the safety of airway management.Using temporomandibular joint mobility to predict difficult tracheal intubation.The aim of this prospective study was to determine the reliability of temporomandibular joint (TMJ) mobility measurements for predicting difficult intubation. To evaluate the accuracy in predicting difficult intubation by TMJ mobility measurement, 762 patients requiring general anesthesia with tracheal intubation for elective surgery were enrolled in this prospective, observational, single-blind study. Maximum mouth opening, right-left jaw excursion, and degrees of protraction were determined with a digital inclinometer. Incisor gap was measured using a vernier caliper during full mouth opening. After induction of anesthesia using a standard protocol, the patient's grade of laryngeal view by Cormack-Lehane classification was documented by an anesthesiologist. We found that the degrees of protraction and incisor gap in the easy intubation group were significantly higher than those in the difficult intubation group. The incisor gap was found to be more sensitive (88.37%) and more specific (95.71%) than protraction degrees (58.14% and 59.76%, respectively). The results revealed that measurements of the incisor gap and degrees of protraction may be useful routine screening tests for preoperative prediction of difficult intubation.Comparison of five methods in predicting difficult laryngoscopy: Neck circumference, neck circumference to thyromental distance ratio, the ratio of height to thyromental distance, upper lip bite test and Mallampati test.Preoperative airway assessment tests have been presented to help in anticipating a difficult airway. We conducted this study to compare five methods in prediction of difficult laryngoscopy: Neck circumference (NC), NC to thyromental distance ratio (NC/TMD), the ratio of height to thyromental distance (RHTMD), upper lip bite test (ULBT) and Mallampati test (MMT). These five methods are the most commonly used ones and have different powers for it. It was not clear which of these methods predicts difficult laryngoscopy better.Six hundred consecutive patients participated in this study. NC, NC/TMD and RHTMD were measured, and ULBT and MMT were performed and recorded. The laryngoscopy view was graded according to Cormack and Lehane's scale (CLS) and difficult laryngoscopy was defined as CLS grades 3 and 4. Accuracy of tests in predicting difficult laryngoscopy was assessed using the area under a receiver-operating characteristic curve.The area under the curve in ULBT and RHTMD were significantly larger than that in TMD, NC and MMT. No statistically significant differences were noted between TMD, NC and MMT (all P > 0.05) (ULBT = RHTMD > NC/TMD > TMD = NC = MMT). RHTMD (>22.7 cm) exhibited the highest sensitivity (sensitivity = 64.77, 95% confidence interval [CI]: 53.9-74.7) and the most specific test was ULBT (specificity = 99.41%, 95% CI: 98.3-99.9).RHTMD and ULBT as simple preoperative bedside tests have a higher level of accuracy compared to NC/TMD, TMD, NC, MMT in predicting a difficult airway.To compare the accuracy of prayer's sign and Mallampatti test in predicting difficult intubation in diabetic patients.To determine the accuracy of Prayer's sign and Mallampatti test in predicting difficult endotracheal intubation in diabetic patients.The cross-sectional study was performed at Aga Khan University Hospital, Karachi, over a period from January 2009 to April 2010, and comprised 357 patients who required endotracheal intubation for elective surgical procedures. Prayer's sign and Mallampatti tests were performed for the assessment of airway by trained observers. Ease or difficulty of laryngoscopy after the patient was fully anaesthetised with standard technique were observed and laryngoscopic view of first attempt was rated according to Cormack-Lehan grade of intubation. SPSS 15 was used for statistical analysis.Of the 357 patients, 125 (35%) were classified as difficult to intubate. Prayer's sign showed significantly lower accuracy, positive and negative predictive values than Mallampatti test. The sensitivity of Prayer's sign was lower 29.6 (95% Confidence Interval, 21.9-38.5) than Mallampatti test 79.3 (95% confidence interval, 70.8-85.7) while specificity of both the tests was not found to be significantly different.Prayer's sign is not acceptable as a single best bedside test for prediction of difficult intubation.Prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in obstetric patients scheduled for Caesarean delivery.Failed intubation is an important cause of anaesthetic-related maternal mortality. The purpose of this study was to determine the ability to predict difficult visualization of the larynx from the following preoperative airway predictive indices, in isolation and combination: modified Mallampati test, the ratio of height to thyromental distance and the Upper-Lip-Bite test.We collected data on 400 consecutive parturients scheduled for elective Caesarean delivery under general anaesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation and then assessed all three factors before surgery. An experienced anaesthesiologist, not apprised of the recorded preoperative airway assessment, performed the laryngoscopy and grading (as per Cormack and Lehane's classification). Sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value for each airway predictor in isolation and in combination were determined.Difficult laryngoscopy (Grade 3 or 4) occurred in 35 patients (8.75%). The ratio of height to thyromental distance had a higher sensitivity, positive predictive value and fewer false negatives than the other variables tested. The ratio of height to thyromental distance of 21.24 provided the best cut-off point for predicting subsequent difficult laryngoscopy. The odds ratio (95% CI) of the ratio of height to thyromental distance, Mallampati class and the Upper-Lip-Bite test were 127.8 (44.8-364.5), 49.8 (20.3-121.8) and 6.6 (2.29-19.30), respectively.The ratio of height to thyromental distance may prove a useful screening test for predicting difficult laryngoscopy in obstetric population.[Proposal for a new multifactor screening score of difficult intubation in ORL and stomatognathic surgery: preliminary study].This study assessed prospectively in 295 ENT adult patients the predictive value of clinical indicators for difficult intubation and of a new multifactorial score, established by the allocation of points (0, 3, 5 or 7) depending on the degree of presence of seven factors: pathology known to be associated with a difficult intubation, clinical signs of airways' pathology, inter-incisors gap and mandible's luxation, submental mandibular-thyroid distance, normal or short and broad neck, head and neck movements, and Mallampati's test. The incidence of difficult laryngoscopy was 14% and the use of particular techniques for tube insertion was required in 8% of patients. The presence of malformation or pathology often associated with a difficult intubation and the presence of functional signs of airways' pathology predict the difficulties of laryngoscopy and tracheal intubation with a good sensitivity and specificity. The analysis of the "Receiver Operating Characteristic curves" showed that a score higher or equal to 11 allows the prediction of difficult intubations with a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 90%.Predictive models for difficult laryngoscopy and intubation. A clinical, radiologic and three-dimensional computer imaging study.To identify the variables most useful in predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation from various clinical, skeletal (lateral x-rays) and soft tissue (three-dimensional computed tomography imaging) measurements.Twenty-four adult patients in whom an unanticipated difficult tracheal intubation was identified according to established criteria were evaluated. Further, a control group of 32 patients in whom tracheal intubation was easily accomplished was studied. We applied multivariate discriminant analysis to clinical and radiological data of all patients to select those variables most useful in predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was used to describe the discrimination abilities and to explore the trade-offs between sensitivity and specificity of the model.With the clinical data alone, discriminant analysis identified four risk factors that correlated with the prediction of difficult laryngoscopy and intubation: thyrosternal distance, thyromental distance, neck circumference and Mallampati classification. With both clinical and radiological data, discriminant analysis identified five risk factors: thyrosternal distance, thyromental distance, Mallampati classification, depth of spine C2 and angle A (the most antero-inferior point of the upper central incisor tooth). The positive predictive value of this combined (clinical and radiological) model was greater than that of the clinical model alone (95.8% vs 87.5%, respectively). The areas under the ROC curves, that measure the probability of the correct prediction of the clinical and the combined models, were found to be 0.933 and 0.973, respectively.These models can be used for predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation in clinical practice.Mallampati test as a predictor of laryngoscopic view.To determine the accuracy of the modified Mallampati test for predicting difficult tracheal intubation.A cross-sectional, clinical, observational, non-blinded study. A quality analysis of anesthetic care.Operating theatres and department of anesthesiology in a university hospital.Following the local ethics committee approval and patients' informed consent to anesthesia, all adult patients (> 18 yrs) presenting for any type of non-emergency surgical procedures under general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation were enrolled. Prior to anesthesia, Samsoon and Young's modification of the Mallampati test (modified Mallampati test) was performed. Following induction, the anesthesiologist described the laryngoscopic view using the Cormack-Lehane scale. Classes 3 or 4 of the modified Mallampati test were considered a predictor of difficult intubation. Grades 3 or 4 of the Cormack-Lehane classification of the laryngoscopic view were defined as impaired glottic exposure. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value, relative risk, likelihood ratio and accuracy of the modified Mallampati test were calculated on 2x2 contingency tables.Of the total 1,518 patients enrolled, 48 had difficult intubation (3.2%). We failed to detect as many as 35.4% patients in whom glottis exposure during direct laryngoscopy was inadequate (sensitivity 0.646). Compared to the original article by Mallampati, we found lower specificity (0.824 vs. 0.995), lower positive predictive value (0.107 vs. 0.933), higher negative predictive value (0.986 vs. 0.928), lower likelihood ratio (3.68 vs. 91.0) and accuracy (0.819 vs. 0.929).When used as a single examination, the modified Mallampati test is of limited value in predicting difficult intubation.Prevalence and prediction of difficult intubation in maxillofacial surgery patients.The failure to maintain a patent airway after the induction of general anesthesia is a major concern for anesthesiologists. For securing the airway, tracheal intubation using direct laryngoscopy remains the method of choice in most cases. However, direct laryngoscopic intubation is difficult in 1% to 4%, and impossible in 0.05% to 0.35%, of patients who have seemingly normal airways. This study sought to determine the prevalence of difficult intubation in maxillofacial surgery patients, and to evaluate the usefulness of various predictive tests for difficult intubation.This study was conducted on 208 patients undergoing maxillofacial surgery. During the preoperative visit, patients were examined in terms of the test of Mallampati et al (Can Anaesth Soc J 32:429, 1985), thyromental distance, sternomental distance, and interincisal distance. Direct laryngoscopic grading, as defined by Cormack and Lehane (Anesthesia 39:1105, 1984), was recorded for each patient. An intubation of "no difficulty" was noted when the tube was inserted into the fully visualized larynx with little effort on the first attempt.Intubation was possible in all patients. Combinations of different predictive tests resulted in higher sensitivity. Among all test types, that of Cormack and Lahene was thought to exhibit the highest sensitivity and positive predictive values when used alone. The prevalence of difficult intubation in our group of maxillofacial surgery patients was 15.4%. It may be concluded that a combination of predictive variables can be used to improve sensitivity.We demonstrated that combining the Mallampati test with other instruments of measurement resulted in higher sensitivity than when either test was used alone.The reliability and validity of the upper lip bite test compared with the Mallampati classification to predict difficult laryngoscopy: an external prospective evaluation.Recently, a new bedside screening test to predict the occurrence of a difficult laryngoscopy has been developed as a substitute for the Mallampati classification. The Upper-Lip-Bite test (ULBT) evaluated the patient's ability to reach or completely cover the upper lip with the lower incisors. It is often accepted that new predictive tools should undergo an external evaluation before the tool is used in clinical practice. Thus, we evaluated this test with respect to applicability, interobserver reliability, and discriminating power and compared it with the Mallampati-score (using Samsoon and Young's modification). The ULBT could not be applied in 12% of all patients (Mallampati score, <1%). However, the interobserver reliability was better for the ULBT (kappa = 0.79 versus kappa = 0.59). The discriminating power to predict a patient with difficult laryngoscopy was evaluated in 1425 consecutive patients. Both tests were assessed simultaneously in these patients by two specially trained independent observers. After the induction of anesthesia, the laryngoscopic view was assessed by the attending anesthesiologist using the classification of Cormack and Lehane. A grade I or II was called easy laryngoscopy and grade III and IV difficult laryngoscopy. The discriminating power for both tests was low (0.60 for the ULBT [95% confidence interval, 0.57-0.63] and 0.66 [0.63-0.69]) for the Mallampati score), indicating that both tests are poor predictors as single screening tests.Prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in a population of Nigerian obstetric patients.Difficulty in the maintenance of the airway during obstetric anaesthesia is a major contributory factor in anaesthetic related morbidity and mortality. There is an eightfold increase in the incidence of failed intubation in obstetrics. This is attributable to the physiological changes in pregnancy. Eighty consecutive obstetric patients, over a one year period who required general anaesthesia for caesarian section were evaluated using five bedside tests viz: Mallampati test, Thyrometal distance, Sterno-mental distance, Horizontal length of the Mandible and Inter-incisor gap. Eight patients had difficult laryngoscopy (10%). Mallampati test had a sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of 87.1%, 99.6% and 70% respectively. The values obtained for the Thyro-mental distance were 62.5%, 93.1% and 50% respectively. The other tests were not able to predict intubation difficulty significantly. When all tests were combined, sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive were values 100%, 36.1% and 14.8%. The combination of Mallampati and Thyro-mental distance had values of 100%, 93.1% and 61.5%--sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value. Mallampati can be used as the sole predictor of difficult intubation in Nigerian obstetric patients.Predictors of difficult intubation defined by the intubation difficulty scale (IDS): predictive value of 7 airway assessment factors.The intubation difficulty scale (IDS) has been used as a validated difficulty score to define difficult intubation (DI). The purpose of this study is to identify airway assessment factors and total airway score (TAS) for predicting DI defined by the IDS.There were 305 ASA physical status 1-2 patients, aged 19-70 years, who underwent elective surgery with endotracheal intubation. During the pre-anesthetic visit, we evaluated patients by 7 preoperative airway assessment factors, including the following: Mallampati classification, thyromental distance, head & neck movement, body mass index (BMI), buck teeth, inter-incisor gap, and upper lip bite test (ULBT). After endotracheal intubation, patients were divided into 2 groups based on their IDS score estimated with 7 variables: normal (IDS < 5) and DI (IDS ≥ 5) groups. The incidence of TAS (> 6) and high score of each airway assessment factor was compared in two groups: odds ratio, confidence interval (CI) of 95%, with a significant P value ≤ 0.05.The odds ratio of TAS (> 6), ULBT (class III), head & neck movement (< 90°), inter-incisor gap (< 4 cm), BMI (≥ 25 kg/m(2)) and Mallampati classification (≥ class III) were respectively 13.57 (95% CI = 2.99-61.54, P < 0.05), 12.48 (95% CI = 2.50-62.21, P < 0.05), 3.11 (95% CI = 0.87-11.13), 2.32 (95% CI = 0.75-7.19), 2.22 (95% CI = 0.81-6.06), and 1.22 (95% CI = 0.38-3.89).We suggest that TAS (> 6) and ULBT (class III) are the most useful factors predicting DI.Prediction of difficult laryngoscopy: Extended mallampati score versus the MMT, ULBT and RHTMD.Preoperative using of anatomical landmarks detects potentially difficult laryngoscopies. The main object of the present study was to evaluate the predictive power of Extended Mallampati Score (EMS) in comparison with modified Mallampati test (MMT), the ratio of height to thyromental distance (RHTMD) and the Upper-Lip-Bite test (ULBT) in isolation and combination.Four hundred seventy sixadult patients who candidate for elective surgery under general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation were included in this study and evaluated based of all four factors before surgery. This study was randomized prospective double - blind. After that, laryngoscopy was performed by an anesthesiologist who didn't involve in preoperative airway assessment and graded based on Cormack and Lehane's classification. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, and area under receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) (AUC) for each score.The AUCof the ROC was significantly more for the ULBT (AUC = 0.820, P = 0.049) and RHTMD score (AUC = 0.845, P = 0.033) than the EMS (AUC = 0.703). This variable was significantly higher for the EMS compared with MMT (0.703 vs. 0.569, P = 0.046 respectively). There was no significant difference between the AUC of the ROC for the ULBT and the RHTMD score (P = 0.685). The optimalcut-off point for the RHTMD for predicting difficult laryngoscopy was 29.3.EMS predicted difficult laryngoscopy better than MMT while both ULBT and RHTMD had more power than EMS and MMT in this regard. ULBT and RHTMD had similar predictive value for prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in general population.An assessment of the predictors of difficult intubation in patients with acromegaly.Various clinical signs have been used for assessing difficult intubation in patients with acromegaly. These signs include the modified Mallampati classification, measurement of thyromental distance and head and neck movements. Some authors have also tried to establish a relationship between growth hormone levels and difficult intubation. We hypothesized that duration of symptoms in patients with acromegaly may have an association with difficult airway and difficult laryngoscopy. In this prospective study we evaluated tests of airway assessment such as: (i) the Mallampati grade; (ii) the thyromental distance; and (iii) the laryngoscopic grade (Cormack-Lehane). The growth hormone levels and the duration of disease symptoms were also examined. Significant correlation was observed between the Cormack-Lehane and Mallampati gradings (p = 0.05; rho = 19.3%), and between the thyromental distance and the duration of the symptoms (p = 0.03; rho = 26.9%). The incidence of Mallampati III and IV grades was higher in patients with acromegaly. Increased thyromental distance was noted in patients with a long duration of disease. However, increased thyromental distance was not associated with difficult laryngoscopy.Comparison of Mallampati test with lower jaw protrusion maneuver in predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation.Failure to maintain a patent airway is one of the commonest causes of anesthesia-related morbidity and mortality. Many protocols, algorithms, and different combinations of tested methods for airway assessment have been developed to predict difficult laryngoscopy and intubation. The reported incidence of a difficult intubation varies from 1.5% to 13%. The objective of this study was to compare Mallampati test (MT) with lower jaw protrusion (LJP) maneuver in predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation.Seven hundred and sixty patients were included in the study. All the patients underwent MT and LJP maneuver for their airway assessment. After a standardized technique of induction of anesthesia, primary anesthetist performed laryngoscopy and graded it according to the grades described by Cormack and Lehane. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated for both these tests with 95% confidence interval (CI) using conventional laryngoscopy as gold standard. Area under curve was also calculated for both, MT and LJP maneuver. A P < 0.05 was taken as significant.LJP maneuver had higher sensitivity (95.9% vs. 27.1%), NPV (98.7% vs. 82.0%), and accuracy (90.1% vs. 80.3%) when compared to MT in predicting difficult laryngoscopy and intubation. Both tests, however, had similar specificity and PPV. There was marked difference in the positive and negative likelihood ratio between LJP and MT. Similarly, the area under the curve favored LJP maneuver over MT.The results of this study show that LJP maneuver is a better test to predict difficult laryngoscopy and tracheal intubation. We recommend the addition of this maneuver to the routine preoperative evaluation of airway.Predicting difficult endotracheal intubation in surgical patients scheduled for general anesthesia: a prospective blind study.We conducted a prospective, blind study to determine whether a difficult endotracheal intubation could be predicted preoperatively by evaluation of one or more anatomic features of the head. In 471 adults presenting for elective surgery, the size of the tongue relative to the oral cavity was assessed according to the Mallampati classification (oropharyngeal class), and the distance between the chin and thyroid cartilage (thyromental distance) and the angle at full extension of the head (head extension) were measured. At laryngoscopy, the difficulty in visualizing the larynx was determined by a different observer. Assignment to oropharyngeal Class 3, a thyromental distance < or = 7 cm, and a head extension < or = 80 degrees, considered either alone or in various combinations, had low sensitivity and positive predictive values in identifying patients with airways that were difficult to intubate, but high specificity and negative predictive values. We conclude that these three tests are of little value in predicting difficult intubation in adults, although the likelihood of an easy endotracheal intubation is high when they yield negative results.Comparison between different tests and their combination for prediction of difficult intubation: An analytical study.There is an impelling need for accurate tests to predict difficult intubation, as failure to achieve endotracheal intubation causes significant morbidity and mortality in anesthetic practice.To calculate the validity of the different tests along with their combination and agreement when compared with endotracheal intubation in predicting difficult intubation.Operation theaters, analytical study.Three hundred patients aged between 16 and 60 years of American society of anesthesiologist (ASA) physical status I and II, scheduled for elective surgical procedures requiring endotracheal intubation were studied during January-July 2012. Mallampati grade (MP), sternomental distance (SMD), thyromental distance (TMD), and Delilkan and Calder test were recorded for every patient. Endotracheal intubation was performed by an experienced anesthesiologist blinded to the measurements and recorded grading of intubation. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), likelihood ratio (LR), odds ratio (OR), and kappa coefficient of tests individually and in combination were calculated.IBM SPSS software (version 16.0) and Epi-info software (version 3.2).Difficult and failed intubation was 13.3% and 0.6%, respectively. Difficult intubation increased with age. TMD and Calder test showed highest sensitivity individually and Dellilkan's test showed least sensitivity. Among the combination of tests, MP with SMD and MP with Calder test had the highest sensitivity.Among individual test TMD and Calder are better predictive tests in terms of sensitivity. Combination of tests increases the chance of prediction of difficult intubation.The incidence of class "zero" airway and the impact of Mallampati score, age, sex, and body mass index on prediction of laryngoscopy grade.In an earlier study we proposed the addition of a new airway class, zero (visualization of the epiglottis), to the four classes of the modified Mallampati classification. In this prospective study, 764 surgical patients were assessed with regard to their airway class (including class zero), laryngoscopy grade, and the effect of the airway class and other predictors on the laryngoscopy grade.Comparison of two methods for predicting difficult intubation.Two methods of predicting difficult laryngoscopy were compared prospectively. Mallampati class and Wilson risk-sum were determined before operation and laryngeal view graded in 675 patients. Both tests identified five of 12 difficult laryngoscopies; twice as many patients were predicted to be difficult by Mallampati classification than by Wilson risk-sum. Inter-observer variation was minimal using Wilson risk-sum, but considerable for Mallampati classification. We prefer the Wilson risk-sum for assessment of the airway, while noting that both tests have poor sensitivities.Preoperative airway assessment: predictive value of a multivariate risk index.Using readily available and objective airway risk criteria, a multivariate model for stratifying risk of difficult endotracheal intubation was developed and its accuracy compared to currently applied clinical methods. We studied 10,507 consecutive patients who were prospectively assessed prior to general anesthesia with respect to mouth opening, thyromental distance, oropharyngeal (Mallampati) classification, neck movement, ability to prognath, body weight, and history of difficult tracheal intubation. After induction of anesthesia, the laryngeal view during rigid laryngoscopy was graded and the ability of experienced anesthesia personnel to ventilate via a mask was determined. Poor intubating conditions (laryngoscopy Grade IV) and inability to achieve adequate mask ventilation were identified in 107 (1%) and 8 (0.07%) cases, respectively. Logistic regression identified all seven criteria as independent predictors of difficulty with laryngoscopic visualization. A composite airway risk index (derived from nominalized odds ratios calculated from the multivariate model) as well a simplified (0 = low, 1 = medium, 2 = high) risk weighting exhibited higher positive predictive value for laryngoscopy Grade IV at scores with similar sensitivity to Mallampati class III, as well as higher sensitivity at scores with similar positive predictive value. Compared to Mallampati class I fewer false-negative predictions were observed at a risk index value of 0. We conclude that improved risk stratification for difficulty with visualization during rigid laryngoscopy (Grade IV) can be obtained by use of a simplified preoperative multivariate airway risk index, with better accuracy compared to oropharyngeal (Mallampati) classification at both low- and high-risk levels.Relationship between difficult tracheal intubation and obstructive sleep apnoea.The upper airway abnormalities predisposing to difficult tracheal intubation may also predispose to obstructive sleep apnoea (OSA). The potential association is important as both conditions increase perioperative risk and patients with a trachea that is difficult to intubate may need assessment for OSA. We determined if patients with difficult intubation are at greater risk of OSA and, if so, whether or not they have characteristic clinical or radiographic upper airway changes. We studied 15 patients in whom the trachea was difficult to intubate and 15 control patients. Each was evaluated clinically (Mallampati score, thyromental distance, neck circumference, head extension), polysomnographically (apnoea-hypoponea index (AHI)) and radiographically (lateral cephalometry). AHI was greater in the difficult intubation group (mean 28.4 (SD 31.7)) compared with controls (5.9 (8.9)) (P < 0.02); eight of 15 patients in the difficult intubation group and two of 15 in the control group had an AHI > 10 (P < 0.03). Difficult intubation, but not OSA, was associated (P < 0.05) with a smaller thyromental distance and mandibular length, and greater soft palate length. Both difficult intubation and OSA were associated (P < 0.05) with a greater Mallampati score, anterior mandibular depth, and smaller mandibular and cervical angles. OSA, but not difficult intubation, was associated (P < 0.05) with increased neck circumference, tongue area and craniocervical angle, and decreased head extension, mandibular ramus length and atlantooccipital distance. We conclude that difficult intubation and OSA are related significantly. They share anatomical features which act to reduce the skeletal confines of the tongue. Patients with OSA may compensate, when awake, by increasing craniocervical angulation, which increases the space between the mandible and cervical spine and elongates the tongue and soft tissues of the neck.Difficult tracheal intubation is more common in obese than in lean patients.Whether tracheal intubation is more difficult in obese patients is debatable. We compared the incidence of difficult tracheal intubation in obese and lean patients by using a recently validated objective scale, the intubation difficulty scale (IDS). We studied 134 lean (body mass index, <30 kg/m2) and 129 obese (body mass index, >or=35 kg/m2) consecutive patients. The IDS scores, categorized as difficult intubation (IDS >or=>5) or not (IDS <5), and the patient data, including oxygen saturation (SpO2) while breathing oxygen, were compared between lean and obese patients. In addition, risk factors for difficult intubation were determined in obese patients. The IDS score was >or=5 in 3 lean and 20 obese patients (P = 0.0001). A Mallampati score of III-IV was the only independent risk factor for difficult intubation in obese patients (odds ratio, 12.51; 95% confidence interval, 2.01-77.81), but its specificity and positive predictive value were 62% and 29%, respectively. SpO2 values noted during intubation were (mean +/- SD) 99% +/- 1% (range, 91%-100%) and 95% +/- 8% (range, 50%-100%) in lean and obese patients, respectively (P < 0.0001). We conclude that difficult intubation is more common among obese than nonobese patients. None of the classic risk factors for difficult intubation was satisfactory in obese patients. The high risk of desaturation warrants studies to identify new predictors of difficult intubation in the obese.We report a difficult intubation rate of 15.5% in obese patients and 2.2% in lean patients. None of the risk factors for difficult intubation described in the lean population was satisfactory in the obese patients. We also report a high risk of desaturation in obese patients with difficult intubation.An assessment of the ratio of height to thyromental distance compared to thyromental distance as a predictive test for prediction of difficult tracheal intubation in Thai patients.Preoperative evaluation is important in the detection of patients at risk for difficult tracheal intubation. Thyromental distance (TMD) is often used for these purposes, but its value as an indicator for difficult intubation is questionable, as it varies with patient size and body proportions. The purpose of the present study was to evaluate and compare the accuracies of the ratio of patient's height to TMD (ratio of height to TMD = RHTMD) and TMD alone in the prediction of difficult tracheal intubation in Thai patients.The authors collected data on 382 consecutive patients scheduled to receive general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation for elective surgery. Thyromental distance and RHTMD were evaluated preoperatively. Difficult intubation was defined in the present study by Cormack and Lehane grade 3 or 4. The optimal predictive value was chosen using a receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve. The areas under the ROC curves (AUC) of TMD and RHTMD were compared to determine the performance of the different predictive tests used. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of each of the predictive tests were calculated according to standard formulae.Difficult intubation occurred in 42 patients (10.9 %). The predictive advantage of RHTMD has a similar specificity with improved sensitivity in comparison with TMD. The AUC of RHTMD was significantly greater than the AUC of TMD (p = 0.00). The authors concluded that RHTMD had better accuracy in predicting difficult intubation than TMD.A comparison of between hyomental distance ratios, ratio of height to thyromental, modified Mallamapati classification test and upper lip bite test in predicting difficult laryngoscopy of patients undergoing general anesthesia.Failed intubation is imperative source of anesthetic interrelated patient's mortality. The aim of this present study was to compare the ability to predict difficult visualization of the larynx from the following pre-operative airway predictive indices, in isolation and combination: Modified Mallampati test (MMT), the ratio of height to thyromental distance (RHTMD), hyomental distance ratios (HMDR), and the upper-lip-bite test (ULBT).We collected data on 525 consecutive patients scheduled for elective surgery under general anesthesia requiring endotracheal intubation and then evaluated all four factors before surgery. A skilled anesthesiologist, not imparted of the noted pre-operative airway assessment, did the laryngoscopy and rating (as per Cormack and Lehane's classification). Sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value for every airway predictor in isolation and in combination were established.The most sensitive of the single tests was ULBT with a sensitivity of 90.2%. The hyomental distance extreme of head extension was the least sensitive of the single tests with a sensitivity of 56.9. The HMDR had sensitivity 86.3%. The ULBT had the highest negative predictive value: And the area under a receiver-operating characteristic curve (AUC of ROC curve) among single predictors. The AUC of ROC curve for ULBT, HMDR and RHTMD was significantly more than for MMT (P < 0.05). No significant difference was noted in the AUC of ROC curve for ULBT, HMDR, and RHTMD (P > 0.05).The HMDR is comparable with RHTMD and ULBT for prediction of difficult laryngoscopy in the general population, but was significantly more than for MMT.A study of radiologic imaging techniques and airway grading to predict a difficult endotracheal intubation.To study whether a detailed radiographic examination of neck and upper airway can help identify normal looking patients in whom endotracheal intubation may be difficult; determine whether such parameters as identified by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) can also be identified in a soft tissue radiograph; and to study the correlation between oropharyngeal appearance, based on Mallampati's classification, and laryngoscopic findings in a large number of patients requiring endotracheal intubation.Prospective.University medical center.20 adult patients in whom an unanticipated difficult endotracheal intubation was encountered, and a control group of 20 patients in whom endotracheal intubation was easily accomplished.Difficult-to-intubate patients were identified according to prospectively established criteria. Control subjects, in whom the trachea was easily intubated, were matched for age, gender, height, weight, and oropharyngeal appearance.In all 40 study patients, a soft tissue radiograph and an MRI scan of the neck were obtained. We measured 21 parameters from both radiographic studies. There were no significant differences between the two groups in 20 of 21 measured parameters on MRI scans and soft tissue radiographs. Only one measurement--the distance between the uppermost visible part of the airway and the posterior pharyngeal wall (measured from MRI scans only)--between the two groups achieved statistical significance. The values recorded from MRI and soft tissue radiographs were not significantly different. Airway grading system first suggested by Mallampati had a fair correlation with laryngoscopy findings associated with a difficult endotracheal intubation.No significant difference between the two groups could be identified on soft tissue radiography or MRI scans.